 Standing in the way of any such deal is media mogul Murdoch, the $22 billion company’s biggest shareholder, who was blocked from acquiring the rest of the pay-TV provider in 2011 after a scandal involving phone hacking at his UK.
 “As shown during trial, Bazaarvoice executives clearly intended to eliminate competition by acquiring PowerReviews,” Assistant Attorney General Bill Baer, in charge of the antitrust division, said yesterday in a statement.
 The CEO said he is not interested in acquiring stakes in AirBaltic AS, LOT Polish Airlines SA or Korean Air Lines Co, and added that it’s “premature” for the company to consider raising its holding in Aer Lingus Group Plc.
 1MDB has built an energy business from scratch in less than two years, acquiring assets from Malaysian billionaire T.
 Certainly Jamie Dimon plays a significant role -- hiring more people who are good at making money, firing the people whose skills run toward losing it, acquiring whole companies whose money-making records were let's say mixed, setting strategic priorities for where the most money is to be made, and bopping around motivating everyone to make more money -- but the dollar value of what he does in that role is less certain.
 carriers spent 234 billion pounds ($388 billion) last year acquiring rights to use the spectrum, the airwaves that carry calls and data, in an auction.
 the chance to move beyond paper-and-ink printers by acquiring a leader in the technology that’s used to replicate nuts, bolts and even football cleats.
 Hurdles in acquiring land are standing in the way of several mining projects, including those of NTPC, Coal India and Steel Authority of India Ltd.
 provider of pay TV, built its stockpile of wireless airwaves by acquiring spectrum from the bankrupt companies DBSD North America Inc.
 The company then attempted to gain more spectrum last year by acquiring Clearwire, an offer that valued the wireless-network operator at as much as $64 billion.
 is acquiring 60 investment advisers and their staff as part of an agreement with Richardson GMP Ltd.
 The Detroit-based carmakersold its Peugeot stake in December, 21 months after acquiringthe holding.
 Gannicott has transformed Dominion in the past 18 months by acquiring BHP Billiton Ltd’s 80 percent stake in the Ekati mine in Canada’s Northwest Territories and then selling the Harry Winston business to Biel, Switzerland-based Swatch for $1 billion.
 Petro Kacur, a spokesman for Coca-Cola, said the company doesn’t comment on speculation, when asked whether it’s still interested in acquiring Monster.
 Anheuser-Busch InBev NV, the maker of Budweiser, also has distribution agreements with Monster and would benefit from acquiring the energy drink company, the Stifel analysts wrote in a Dec.
 While PepsiCo’s Americas Beverages division has the most to gain initially from acquiring Monster, Chief Executive Officer Indra Nooyi doesn’t seem interested in such a large purchase, the report said.
 “We do not need large-scale M&A to deliver on our financial goals” Representatives for PepsiCo and Anheuser-Busch said they don’t comment on speculation, when asked whether they’re considering acquiring Monster.
 In response, Facebook has been adding features such as hashtags, which group items of a certain topic together, and acquiring startups that make tools to process current events.
 GM disposed of its Peugeot holding in December, about 21 months after acquiring the stock for 320 million euros as the partnership formed.
 Lenovo essentially negotiated a layaway plan for acquiring Motorola, with the sale including $141 billion in cash and Lenovo stock paid at the close of the deal, and $15 billion to be paid in a three-year promissory note, Mountain View, California-based Google said in a statement dated Jan.
 “Yang has a very good track record of acquiring non-profitable businesses and turning them to profit” Not all investors agreed.
 Wells Fargo has been expanding in investment banking after acquiring a securities business in the 2008 purchase of Wachovia Corp.
 Merck has been expanding outside of drugs after acquiring biotechnology-equipment supplier Millipore in 2010 for about $6 billion.
 European cable and fixed-line assets are attracting buyers, with Vodafone Group Plc acquiring Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for more than $10 billion in October -- beating an offer from Liberty Global -- to bolster its fixed-line business in Germany.
 stocks” Virgin Media Liberty Global has sought to extend its reach in Europe, acquiring the UK’s Virgin Media Inc.
 Dish sent a termination letter just before a trial began today in Manhattan bankruptcy court, where the satellite-television company and Ergen are accused of improperly acquiring the LightSquared debt.
 The Santa Clara, California-based company no longer wanted to incur the expense of acquiring programming and bringing the service to market on its own.
 Takuo Soga, a spokesman for Asahi, declined to comment when asked if the company would be interested in acquiring Super.
 Vivendi in 2011 bought full ownership of SFR by acquiring the 44 percent stake it didn’t already own from Vodafone Group Plc for 8 billion euros.
 for the first time since acquiring Merrill Lynch & Co.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Union Bancaire Privee, the Geneva-based wealth manager founded by Edgar de Picciotto, posted a 10 percent increase in client assets last year after acquiring the Swiss unit of Lloyds Banking Group Plc.
 “So what they’re doing is acquiring successful software-as-a-service businesses, and it helps with attrition” There were $107 billion of deals announced for Internet infrastructure software makers and e-marketing and information providers in 2013, the most in six years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 as its biggest customer, is considering acquiring or collaborating with electronic component makers to develop parts.
 “The fact that Aisin is interested in acquiring tech parts makers means they can finance that” Japanese automobile component makers spent $499 million on acquisitions last year, lower than the $11 billion spent on purchases in 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Botin, 79, is cutting costs and preparing for an economic recovery in Spain following a five-year property bust and said today that a priority for Santander would be to grow in the US, perhaps by acquiring a consumer bank there.
 Level Field BCE, Telus and Toronto-based Rogers have been critical of the Canadian government’s unwillingness to establish what they call a “level playing field” The Big Three say it’s unfair to have government preventing them from acquiring smaller cash-strapped rivals while encouraging larger foreign carriers to come into Canada to do just that, or to bid on spectrum on auction-friendly terms.
 In November 2011, one day after the Malkins disclosed their intent to make the Empire State Building part of a REIT, they unilaterally amended its governing documents to add a “poison pill” provision, blocking anyone from acquiring more than 6 percent of its shares, according to the complaint.
 Liberty Global extended its reach in Europe last year by acquiring the UK’s Virgin Media Inc.
 cable operator may be interested in acquiring the New York market, some midwestern cable regions and Time Warner Cable’s regional sports networks, which broadcast LA.
 soared 39 percent after acquiring Mandiant Corp.
 The Oracle “I didn’t really see much life left in MyAssist, but clearly they’ve got more going for them if the Oracle himself is acquiring them,” Boyadjis said, referring to Buffett.
 Still in effect after April will be an agreement barring Nestle from acquiring more L’Oreal shares until six months after the death of the daughter of L’Oreal founder Eugene Schueller and family matriarch, Liliane Bettencourt, who turns 92 in October.
 soared 39 percent after acquiring Mandiant Corp.
 West Coast, said it plans to develop a $300 million office-and-apartment project in the Hollywood section of Los Angeles after acquiring land from the Academy of Motion Pictures Arts and Sciences.
 Elliott, a New York-based investment firm, is known for acquiring large stakes in companies and pushing for changes.
 and Mercuria Energy Group Ltd, sees both opportunities and challenges in acquiring a commodities operation, James said today.
 said it bought a portfolio of patents from Hewlett-Packard Co, acquiring intellectual property that includes the fundamentals of mobile operating systems.
 No Restrictions There are no formal restrictions preventing Comcast or Charter from acquiring Time Warner Cable.
 Los Angeles Comcast is interested in acquiring Time Warner Cable’s Los Angeles, New York City and Charlotte, North Carolina cable assets, two people said.
 That, too, may entice Comcast to join Charter in its pursuit of acquiring Time Warner Cable, he said.
 Aisin Seiki Co, an auto-parts maker that counts Toyota as its biggest customer, said this month it’s considering acquiring or collaborating with electronic component makers to develop parts.
 said it bought a portfolio of patents from Hewlett-Packard Co, acquiring intellectual property that includes the fundamentals of mobile operating systems.
 Elliott, which controls about 105 percent of Riverbed’s common stock, has a history of acquiring large stakes in companies and pushing for changes.
 “The strategic rationale for acquiring Waertsilae was clear,” given the complementary marine activities, they said.
 The results were weighed down by $366 million in one-time items that included the cost of acquiring Gambro, the company said.
 It’s acquiring a London-based firm whose assets shrank last year as institutional clients pulled funds.
 Standstill Provisions Avago may be interested in acquiring LSI to gain more resources as the cost of designing and building semiconductors rises, Suji De Silva, an analyst at Topeka Capital Markets Inc.
 Athene Chief Executive Officer Jim Belardi has built the company by acquiring sellers of annuities, completing the purchase of Aviva Plc’s US.
 Shares of Dish have climbed about 45 percent since May,when it was reported that Ergen was interested in acquiringLightSquared’s assets.
 Pushing through a deal would mean acquiring a much larger company: Time Warner Cable is the second-biggest US.
 Riverbed responded to Elliott in November by adopting a stockholder rights plan, imposing a “significant penalty” upon any shareholder acquiring 10 percent of the company’s stock without the board’s approval.
 Beijing-based Hony has held informal talks with owners Blackstone Group LP and PAI Partners SAS about acquiring the maker of Digestives biscuits, said the people, who asked not to be named because the deliberations are private.
 Goldman Review Elliott began acquiring shares in September, amassing almost 11 percent, and started pressuring Riverbed to review its strategy and capital structure in November, calling the stock “significantly undervalued” Riverbed then started working with Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 The company also reacted by adopting a poison pill imposing a “significant penalty” upon any shareholder acquiring 10 percent of the company’s stock without the board’s approval.
 It may be interested in acquiring the New York market, some Midwestern cable regions and Time Warner Cable’s regional sports networks, which broadcast LA.
 “We would also consider mergers or acquiring some local partners in China” About 90 percent of the company’s profit comes from the columbarium and cemetery business, according to Lee, who is targeting 10 percent growth in both revenue and profit this year compared with 2013.
 “That’s obviously changed a bit” There will probably be continued interest in acquiring annuity blocks, after investment firms such as Apollo Global Management LLC and Guggenheim Partners LLC added such units, Lukan said.
 Control4 Corp, a Salt Lake City-based maker of home-automation systems, has seen its stock jump more than 65 percent since Google said it was acquiring Nest.
 The bourse will consider acquiring foreign alternative trading systems and exchanges over the next three years, it said in an e-mailed statement today.
 Roberts has spent at least $91 billion acquiring companies in the past dozen years, including the $52 billion purchase of AT&T Inc’s cable business in 2002.
 Roberts’s ambitions partly explain why he tried to buy Disney in 2004 and why he put the Comcast name on the GE building after acquiring NBCUniversal from General Electric Co.
 The next day, ValueAct got hit with another shock when Microsoft informed the fund that it was acquiring Nokia’s handset business, increasing its bet on a hardware focus that the investor didn’t agree with, the people said.
 The rule states that an acquiring company’s investors get to vote on takeovers that would dilute their ownership by 25 percent or more.
 A delay would mean Paulson & Co, Fairholme Capital Management LLC and others who have been acquiring stock in the government-owned companies may have to wait a year or more to learn whether Congress will preserve some value for private shareholders or wipe out their holdings.
 Owning Content Liguori, a veteran network executive formerly at Fox and Discovery, has expanded the company’s TV business, acquiring 19 broadcast stations for $273 billion last year.
 “Under any metric, this acquisition is completely manageable and reasonable for the financial strategy of Bimbo” Bimbo’s purchase of Canada Bread is its biggest since acquiring George Weston’s fresh bread and baked goods business for $25 billion in 2009 to expand in the US.
 Last week, the lender said it was acquiring a controlling stake in Chile’s Corpbanca for at least $22 billion.
 CGI may be interested in acquiring some information-technology companies to expand its US.
 Apple is sticking with its strategy of acquiring smaller companies, while Internet leaders Google Inc.
 regional banks, spooked by crisis-era deals gone awry and a regulatory review holding up M&T Bank Corp’s merger with Hudson City Bancorp Inc, are buying pieces of rivals to sidestep pitfalls of acquiring whole firms.
 “The big concerns are how you avoid acquiring another institution’s problems.
 Era Over BB&T’s King, 65, pushed into Texas by acquiring Colonial Bank as it failed in 2009.
 3 because if we could grow bigger, we will offer aggressive discounts and services, just like we did in Japan” Son and Sprint Chief Executive Officer Dan Hesse met with regulators in Washington to discuss the idea of acquiring T-Mobile and were told there was skepticism such a deal would help competition, people familiar with the matter have said.
 “Since rumors first leaked in mid-2013 about several companies interested in acquiring Time Warner, it has been reported that Time Warner failed to engage in good faith negotiations,” Barrett said in the complaint.
 Big Sky “is one of the assets we’re acquiring,” NRG spokeswoman Karen Cleeve said in a Feb.
 Mahinka said companies that may encounter opposition should consider meeting with agencies that will participate in the CFIUS review as well as representatives of states where the assets they’re acquiring are located.
 16 that it hadagreed to sell the Petrodelta stake to Argentina’s Pluspetrolfor $400 million in cash, with the purchaser acquiring the stakein two transactions.
 in its bid to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, is “still interested in wisely acquiring subscribers,” Chief Executive Officer Tom Rutledge said.
 Close to half the world’s air traffic growth will involve Asian routes over the next 20 years, Boeing marketing chief Randy Tinseth has said, with carriers from the region acquiring 12,820 more aircraft, or 36 percent of the global total.
 Cashless Transaction Slim has the option of acquiring Times Co.
 in acquiring mapping-software provider Waze Inc.
 may be among those interested in acquiring a holding in Carrapateena, David Coates, a Sydney-based analyst at CIMB Group Holdings Bhd, said by phone.
 “But, in the event I do in the future decide to pursue the sale of my voting position, I am excited about providing these two strong executives, who have both created significant shareholder value, with a path toward acquiring that stake and preserving the long-term stability and continuity of the companies they have built and will continue leading into the future,” Malone said.
 The government also provided a clause to charge carriers for acquiring airwaves allocated by India outside of an auction.
 3 because if we could grow bigger, we will offer aggressive discounts and services, just like we did in Japan” Son and Sprint Chief Executive Officer Dan Hesse met with regulators in Washington to discuss the idea of acquiring T-Mobile and were told there was skepticism such a deal would help competition, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Vodafone is in discussions about acquiring broadband and cable companies across its territories as it works to package wireless services with other offers and increase connections to its network.
 In Sydney, Meriton is open to acquiring commercial properties in “top locations,” such as overlooking Hyde Park in the city center, for conversion to apartments, he said.
 It would make sense for Wanxiang to buy Fisker after acquiring the battery-maker, said Shifley.
 Hybrid Tech, as a condition of acquiring the Fisker loan, is required to manufacture in the US.
 JPMorgan wound up acquiring the near-bankrupt Bear Stearns Cos.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Leveraged-buyout firms led by billionaire Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC, seeing fewer bargains in acquiring companies, are loading up on high-risk debt being abandoned by the world’s biggest banks.
 The expansion has put the company co-founded by Black, known for acquiring companies such as Vail Resorts Inc, at the forefront of private-equity firms from Blackstone Group LP to KKR & Co.
 and management of the affiliate, American Energy - Utica LLC, involved in acquiring the acreage.
 “Total gross bookings growth could average in the mid-teens through 2014, with upside depending on how aggressive Expedia is acquiring hotel supply outside North America,” Daniel Kurnos, an analyst with Benchmark Co, said in a research note today.
 Still in effect after April will be an agreement barring Nestle from acquiring more L’Oreal shares until six months after the death of the daughter of L’Oreal founder Eugene Schueller and family matriarch, Liliane Bettencourt, 91.
 phone company, is interested in acquiring Vodafone to gain access to Europe’s burgeoning 4G market, people familiar with the situation said last month.
 It was an unusual case of executives at an acquiring company being paid out after a deal.
 Twitter is also working to expand promotions outside of its social network after acquiring MoPub, a mobile ad exchange.
 After acquiring its 50 percent stake in the company for $16 billion in 2012, Televisa invested 159 billion pesos in the mobile-phone carrier in 2013.
 “We’re not convinced of the logic of Reynolds acquiring Lorillard, we’re not convinced of the logic of BAT acquiring Reynolds, and we’re certainly not convinced that Japan Tobacco would step in and buy brands that were sold off by Reynolds” Tobacco companies account for a large portion of US.
 Last month Charter CEO Tom Rutledge said he was “still interested in wisely acquiring subscribers,” declining to comment specifically on the Comcast deal.
 “We’re not convinced of the logic of Reynolds acquiring Lorillard, we’re not convinced of the logic of BAT acquiring Reynolds, and we’re certainly not convinced that Japan Tobacco would step in and buy brands that were sold off by Reynolds” Tobacco companies account for a large portion of US.
 VimpelCom entered Uzbekistan in 2006 by acquiring Buzteland Unitel, two local operators, for about $260 million.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Spanish television-production company Mediapro plans to start a regional 24-hour Formula One channel after acquiring the series’ rights for most of Central and South America and the Caribbean.
 Merck has been expanding outside of drugs after acquiring biotechnology-equipment supplier Millipore in 2010 for about $6 billion.
 Representatives for MSG, Live Nation and Anschutz declined to comment on the companies’ interest in acquiring WWE.
 “It’s more protective of privacy than the government acquiring a vast amount of call records that it doesn’t need,” Schiff said in a phone interview.
 “The company is seeing double-digit growth in purchases from existing customers and acquiring new customers at a rapid clip,” Mark Miller, an analyst at William Blair & Co, said in a note last week.
 Rosneft became the world’s largest publicly traded oil producer by volume after acquiring TNK-BP for $55 billion in March 2013.
March 25 (Bloomberg) -- Julius Baer Group Ltd, Switzerland’s third-largest wealth manager, is adding Latin American client assets by acquiring a larger stake in a Brazilian financial firm.
 According to formulas used by Kinder Morgan and other MLPs, maintenance work is subtracted from income and leaves less for quarterly payments to investors; money spent on expansion by building or acquiring new pipes doesn’t.
 “One concern we’ve heard from some clients is that the company is announcing this follow-on but not more disclosure on the portfolio that they are acquiring,” Franco said in a telephone interview.
 “You’re not going to see another company acquiring us” More than 500 million people in China access the Internet from mobile devices.
 are acquiring mobile, shopping and entertainment content services as they fight for the attentions of China’s 618 million Internet users.
 This “involves expanding the resource base and acquiring promising assets which have considerable production potential” Output from the Sorovskoye field began in 2013 and totaled 300,000 tons for the year (about 6,000 barrels a day) with 33 production wells drilled on the field, according to the statement.
 may spend “in the hundreds of millions of dollars” acquiring Essar, which operates Kenya’s third-biggest mobile company, according to Waita.
 “You’re not going to see another company acquiring us” Youku has surged 62 percent in the past 12 months, compared with a 63 percent advance for the Bloomberg Index of the most-traded Chinese stocks in the US.
 CH2M Hill may consider acquiring companies that make equipment or technology that would be of use at the Fukushima plant, he said.
 after acquiring control of Sprint Corp.
 Son and Sprint CEO Dan Hesse met with regulators in Washington to discuss the idea of acquiring T-Mobile and were told there was skepticism such a deal would help competition, people with knowledge of the matter have said.
 Chief Executive Officer Jim Belardi built Athene by acquiring insurers, most recently completing the purchase of Aviva Plc’s US.
 ‘Be Lucky’ Most private equity deals in India have been centered on acquiring minority stakes, Ahuja said.
 Checkout Holding LBO Results in Downgrade to B3 Checkout Holding Corp, the parent of Catalina Marketing Corp, was downgraded as a consequence of a leveraged buyout where Berkshire Partners LLC is acquiring majority control from Hellman & Friedman LLC.
 The value of the deal may top Fleury’s 3 billion-real ($13 billion) market value under Brazilian securities rules that require the acquiring company to buy out minority investors when control changes hands.
 Safaricom, 40 percent owned by Vodafone Plc, and Airtel, a unit of New Delhi-based Bharti Airtel Ltd, plan to spend “in the hundreds of millions of dollars” acquiring Essar, which operates Kenya’s third-biggest mobile company, Safaricom Corporate Affairs Director Nzioka Waita said March 26.
 “You’re not going to see another company acquiring us” Chinese Internet companies are grappling with how to attract and keep users who increasingly go online for movies, music, television shows and books.
 subprime mortgage market in 2003 with the acquisition of Household and by 2006 had become the largest subprime lender and the second-largest subprime loan servicer in the United States,” Cook County said in its Chicago complaint, referring to HSBC acquiring Household International Inc.
 Dish is still interested in acquiring more spectrum, Ergen testified today.
 Verizon, based in New York, is shoring up its cash after acquiring full control of its wireless unit in a $130 billion transaction with Vodafone Group Plc.
 “We have not been contacted by them or anyone representing them relating to any interest they might have in acquiring Murad” Nail Expansion Estee Lauder gets 82 percent of revenue from skin-care and makeup products and a category such as nail care could be attractive, said Linda Bolton Weiser, an analyst with B.
 Overstock Says Patent Firms Drop Cases After Pledge to Fight Overstockcom Inc, the online discount retailer, won dismissal of two lawsuits brought by firms that specialize in acquiring patents to obtain royalties from other companies.
 The plan pivots on acquiring two gates American is selling at Dallas Love Field, a Southwest bastion, Virgin America said today.
 Shareholders have been embracing the acquiring companies, Carr said today at the 26th annual Tulane University Corporate Law Institute in New Orleans, signaling faith in the lasting value of transactions as well as challenging the conventional wisdom that they should brace for a selloff.
 companies worth more than $1 billion have risen an average of 52 percent in 2014 the day after announcing they are acquiring a target, a reversal from the 19 percent one-day decline buyers experienced five years ago, according to data from Goldman Sachs.
 Almost 75 percent of acquiring companies have gone up following deal announcements in the fourth quarter of 2013 and the first quarter this year.
 Ford first bought the preferred shares in 2011 when they traded at 4 cents on the dollar and started acquiring the common shares last year.
 Kenanga, founded in 1973, has been expanding by buying ECM Libra Financial Group Bhd’s investment banking unit in 2012 and acquiring control of ING Groep NV’s local fund management business last year.
 On the same day, Alfa Bank, Russia’s largest privately owned lender, said it’s in the “final stage” of acquiring Bank of Cyprus’s Ukraine unit for 224 million euros ($308 million).
 The question for developers has to be, will this continue at the pace it’s at, or is the pendulum swinging too far and will it mellow out again?” Kilroy Realty Corp, a Los Angeles-based owner of commercial real estate along the West Coast, last month said it plans to develop a $300 million office-and-apartment project in Hollywood after acquiring land from the Academy of Motion Pictures Arts and Sciences, bringing the real estate investment trust’s commitments in the area to about $800 million.
 Tullow, the operator of the oil and gas project, joined the concession in 2012 by acquiring 40 percent from Hyperdynamics, which now has 37 percent.
 “On the other hand, it’s a positive transaction for Prisa as the media company needs to trim its debt pile, although I was expecting a slightly higher valuation” Telefonica, which already owns 22 percent of the asset, is interested in acquiring Madrid-based Prisa’s stake in its pay-TV business to expand offerings in Spain, Chief Operating Officer Jose Maria Alvarez-Pallete said in a news conference in Madrid last week.
 The money will go toward acquiring films for Vimeo’s catalog, the company said today in a statement.
 said it is acquiring a minority stake in EIG Global Energy Partners LLC, the asset manager spun off from TCW Group Inc, and William C.
 AMG bought River Road from Aviva Plc, acquiring all of the insurer’s equity stake in the money manager.
 Berenberg Bank cut its rating on construction stocks including the German cement maker to hold from buy, meaning it no longer recommends acquiring the shares.
 Less Risk Penn Virginia bolstered its presence in the formation last year by acquiring Eagle Ford properties from Magnum Hunter Resources Corp.
 Hiro took over the ground lease from Mobil Corp, predecessor of oil company Exxon Mobil Corp, in 1987, a period when Japanese investors were active buyers of New York real estate, acquiring properties such as Rockefeller Center.
 Vodafone approached Grupo Corporativo Ono SA about acquiring the company last month as the Spanish broadband provider prepares for an IPO of its own, people familiar with the matter have said.
 We hope the same applies to the telecommunications sector” ‘Pretty Tough’ The IFT told Televisa it will be prohibited from acquiring exclusive domestic rights to programming that has “unique characteristics that in the past have delivered high audiences,” such as World Cup soccer matches, the company said yesterday.
 Spokesmen for Wind and Vodafone both declined to comment on Vodafone’s interest in acquiring the company.
 Foreign real estate investors acquiring buildings in major American cities will lead to rent increases in coming years, Sikaitis said.
 The Scopel family had operated in Sao Paulo state for four decades, specializing in acquiring the rights to develop residential lots from landowners in return for a share of the eventual lot sales, a bartering system known locally as “permuta” The company would then install basic infrastructure to the land, such as roads and electrical and sewer hook-ups, and sell the individual lots to prospective homeowners, who would then hire their own builders.
 The company’s rate would be lower after acquiring AstraZeneca; Read and other corporate executives wouldn’t quantify the benefit.
 buildings, is interested in acquiring NorthStar Realty Finance Corp, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “But everybody knows that, and there’s limited visibility on the sustainability of it” Gilead will use the cash it generates from hepatitis C to accelerate share buybacks, and won’t go on a spending spree acquiring companies and new drugs, company executives said.
 An investment decision by Mitsubishi comes as Prime Minister Shinzo Abe pushes for more spending at home as Japanese manufacturers move to faster-growing economies in Asia　 The company is interested in acquiring a company though it’s not ready to reach a deal with any potential partners, Tsurumaki said.
 When Facebook said it was acquiring WhatsApp in February, the companies said they planned to continue with WhatsApp’s policies of not collecting any personally identifiable information of users or their contacts.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Cable billionaire John Malone, mounting a challenge against Vodafone Group Plc, would consider acquiring wireless customers and stores in Germany that may be put up for sale pending a review of a merger of the country’s third- and fourth-biggest network operators.
 is also acquiring technology shares, figuring the companies still hold value.
 While he sees Barrick’s top priority to remain as the leading gold producer, he’s open to rethinking the whole business, which may involve acquiring mining assets in other minerals, such as copper, the people also said.
 The Air Force is looking at using smaller satellites, which would “drive a market for smaller launch vehicles, significantly reducing the overall cost of acquiring additional space capabilities,” said Connie Dillon, a spokeswoman.
 discussed acquiring the London-based drugmaker in informal, now-discontinued talks.
 That said, even some industrial companies have changed their tax domicile by acquiring a rival.
 “While there has been speculation of reduced interest in M&A by Chinese oil majors given a more uncertain commodity price outlook, this acquisition confirms China’s interest in acquiring producing assets at attractive valuation levels,” Neil Beveridge, a Hong Kong-based analyst at Sanford C.
 discussed acquiring the London drugmaker in informal, now-discontinued talks.
 Cisco or Hewlett-Packard, which aren’t as strong in data warehousing, would be possible candidates for acquiring it, he said in a phone interview.
 Technology firms may decide buying a company focused on unstructured data is a better move than acquiring a more traditional information-warehousing provider such as Teradata, according to Aaron Schwartz of Jefferies.
 Full Ownership SL Green, said in March that it was assuming full ownership of the complex, acquiring a stake owned by the real estate arm of Canadian pension fund Caisse de Depot & Placement du Quebec.
 discussed acquiring the drugmaker in informal, now-discontinued talks.
 has contacted companies including Sanofi and Johnson & Johnson to see if they would be interested in acquiring the Botox maker.
 Fixed-income While the bank has expanded beyond its fixed-income roots in Europe since acquiring Lehman, it is still a laggard in the region.
 Narula joins money managers including One William Street Capital Management LP and Ellington Management Group LLC in acquiring non-performing loans after foreclosure starts dropped to the lowest level since 2006 and house prices jumped in Phoenix, Las Vegas and other hard-hit markets.
 Serial acquirer Valeant is trying to buy Botox-maker Allergan, and Actavis Plc is acquiring Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Lenders such as PT Bank Danamon and PT Bank Internasional Indonesia expanded over the past decade by acquiring financing companies, while PT Bank Central Asia started a brokerage business to grow beyond commercial banking.
 Siemens, which was also interested in acquiring parts of Alstom more than a decade ago, said it asked for access to the company’s data and permission to interview the management for four weeks in a letter to the French rival.
 Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook extended his buying spree with the iPhone maker acquiring speech-recognition software company Novauris Technologies to help improve its Siri service.
 The deal fits with Apple’s approach of acquiring smaller companies and then swallowing the teams and technology before releasing related features in future products.
 An attorney who represents real estate investors and developers said the ruling raises a “serious concern” for lenders involved in foreclosures because they may not even know there are tenants in the properties they’re acquiring.
 from acquiring Alstom SA of France as a way to boost Europe’s industrial power.
 Canadian Industry Minister Christian Paradis in June blocked Telus, Canada’s second-largest wireless carrier, from acquiring Mobilicity’s airwave licenses as part of efforts to safeguard consumer choice.
 rallied 15 percent on April 4 after news it may be interested in acquiring Meda AB.
 Deutsche Telekom Deutsche Telekom AG may be interested in acquiring the Slovenian phone company, German newspaper Handelsblatt reported in February, citing unnamed Slovenian government sources.
 has contacted companies including Sanofi and Johnson & Johnson to see if either would be interested in acquiring the Botox maker, said people with knowledge of the matter, as it explores its options after receiving an unsolicited $457 billion bid from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 AMG in March said it was acquiring a minority stake in EIG Global Energy Partners LLC, the asset manager spun off from TCW Group Inc.
 sold HowStuffWorks, a website that explains the science behind everything from magnets to Silly String, for $45 million, taking an 82 percent loss seven years after acquiring the asset.
 discussed acquiring the London-based drugmaker in informal, now-discontinued talks.
 in October, expects Abengoa Yield to become its main vehicle for owning, managing and acquiring renewable energy projects, conventional power plants and transmission lines, according to the filing.
 The company expects Abengoa Yield to become its main vehicle for owning, managing and acquiring renewable energy projects, conventional power plants and transmission lines.
 cable company is best suited to compete against current and new competition by acquiring Time Warner Cable, David Cohen, the company’s executive vice president, said April 8.
 buildings, is interested in acquiring NorthStar for about $20 a share, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 This includes Charter swapping its 275,000 Los Angeles subscribers to Comcast, who would take over control of the city after acquiring about 18 million Time Warner Cable customers in the region, the people said.
 The Sunday Times reported yesterday that X2 made an offer for BHP’s thermal coal unit and is considering acquiring its aluminum, nickel and manganese operations.
 Alpha was formed in 2002 and has grown by acquiring assets from companies such as Moravian Run Reclamation Co.
 Sechin oversaw the company’s growth over the past 10 years into the world’s biggest publicly traded oil producer by output, largely through acquiring Yukos Oil Co’s assets and TNK-BP.
 Those sanctions, coupled with difficulties in acquiring land and a renewed threat from leftist Maoist rebels in India’s mineral-rich regions have led companies to look overseas.
 approached the company about acquiring it.
 securities law “allows a company like Pershing to get a running start as there is not disclosure of the intent to take over a firm” until 10 days after acquiring more than 5 percent of the target’s shares, said James Cox, a professor at Duke University School of Law.
 in a $25 billion deal, as other pharmaceutical companies race to gain scale and add products by acquiring rivals.
 “I look at the growth strategy and compare it to the current discount that the stock is trading at, and it’s attractive” National Bank has ramped up expansion in wealth management in the past three years, acquiring the Canadian investment-advisory businesses of HSBC Holdings Plc and Winnipeg-based Wellington West Holdings Inc.
 While takeover interest is always a boon for the target companies, investors also appear to approve of the risks that acquiring companies are taking.
 Ashley sold the holding after acquiring an 11 percent stake in House of Fraser Ltd.
 “This is a long-term project” Domestic Carrier Azul’s fleet is tailored to Brazil’s domestic market, where the Barueri-based discount carrier currently controls about 17 percent of flying after acquiring Trip last year.
 Sechin oversaw the company’s growth over the past 10 years into the world’s biggest publicly traded oil producer by output, largely through acquiring Yukos Oil Co’s assets and TNK-BP.
 “Cigna, when they’ve talked about acquiring businesses, they’ve talked about not necessarily wanting to buy only Medicaid,” Carter said in a phone interview from New York.
 Five-Year Return Anworth’s “abysmally poor performance” in the past decade drove Lipson’s firm to start acquiring its stake and take action this year by nominating five new directors to the board, according to Western’s April 4 filing.
 The Telesat purchase would come in two pieces: buying publicly traded Loral, which owns 63 percent of the company, and acquiring the rest from Canada’s Public Sector Pension Investment Board, which co-owns the satellite operator.
 Wal-Mart is still losing money there two decades after entering South America’s biggest market, acquiring two local chains in the mid-2000s and opening more than 500 stores.
 President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner took control of YPF in April 2012, saying Repsol hadn’t invested enough in boosting output since acquiring the company in 1998.
 “The regulatory environment when it comes to acquiring airlines outside of Europe is just very, very difficult,” she said at the conference in Frankfurt.
 Facebook had earlier expressed interest in acquiring Titan before deciding against it, according to a person with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified because the process wasn’t made public.
 It bought Piscataway, New Jersey-based Telcordia for $115 billion two years ago to strengthen its operations and business support systems market, after acquiring IP-router maker Redback Networks in 2007 for $166 billion.
 A deal would follow a tactic peers have used to cut expenses by acquiring companies in countries with lower corporate tax rates, such as Ireland.
 Valeant may face competition for Allergan, which has contacted companies including Sanofi and Johnson & Johnson to see if either would be interested in acquiring the Botox-maker, according to people with knowledge of the matter who asked not to be identified because the discussions are private.
 Twitter is broadening advertising across the mobile Internet after acquiring MoPub Inc, a mobile ads exchange, in October for about $350 million in stock.
 Munich-based Siemens, which was also interested in acquiring parts of Alstom more than a decade ago, is willing to match or exceed the financial terms of GE’s offer, people familiar with the proposal have said.
 Siemens, which was also interested in acquiring parts of Alstom over a decade ago, is willing to match or exceed the financial terms of GE’s offer, the people said.
 The company will also use the softer market environment to consider acquiring a rig or a company that owns rigs, he said.
 Siemens, which was also interested in acquiring parts of Alstom over a decade ago, is willing to match or exceed the financial terms of GE’s offer, the people said.
 “For Nestle, acquiring Danone’s medical-nutrition business would tick the right strategic boxes -- whether it would be a good deal or not would come down to price,” said RBC Europe analyst James Edwardes Jones, adding that he doesn’t see a compelling reason for Danone to sell it.
 22 that Repsol is willing to spend as much as $10 billion acquiring assets.
 may propose a $30 billion merger in June or July, and Dish Chairman Charlie Ergen has said he would be interested in acquiring T-Mobile if regulators block Sprint’s efforts.
 mobile-phone carrier, approached DirecTV about possibly acquiring the satellite-TV company, the Wall Street Journal said this week, citing people familiar with the situation.
 Opportunities AT&T, which had been exploring wireless opportunities in Europe, including the possibility of acquiring Vodafone Group Plc, has turned its attention back to the US.
 DirecTV CEO Mike White has decided not to transform the direction of his company in recent years, as opposed to Dish’s Ergen, who has spent billions of dollars acquiring wireless spectrum and attempted to buy Sprint Corp.
 The buyout firm is turning its interest to Singapore after acquiring disk-drive parts maker MMI Holdings Ltd.
 is acquiring Stackdriver Inc, a startup that specializes in helping companies that use online computing services from Amazoncom Inc.
 The high costs of acquiring so many new customers also narrowed margins and reduced the average revenue collected from each customer.
 “This asset is one of the last available among the large and high-grade ones discovered during Soviet times, that’s why we are very keen on acquiring it,” Polymetal Deputy Chief Executive Officer Pavel Danilin said in a phone interview.
 IMC Chicago LLC, a unit of Amsterdam-based IMC, will become a designated market maker at the NYSE by acquiring Goldman Sachs’s rights, the companies said in a statement today.
 “They’ve always been acquiring assets,” Omar Zeolla, a corporate credit analyst at Oppenheimer & Co, said in a telephone interview from New York.
 China Demand Japan’s biggest agricultural trader increased its exposure to Chinese food demand by acquiring US.
 Tyson’s $50-a-share offer is a good starting point and far better than Hillshire acquiring Pinnacle and remaining a stand-alone entity, said Dreyer of Gabelli.
 Valeant’s private-equity-like approach of continually acquiring companies and then slashing staff and other costs created a 96 percent gain for its own shareholders last year, which has led other drugmakers to emulate the strategy.
 “The number of people around the world interested in acquiring art at all levels is exploding,” said Christie’s Chief Executive Officer Steven Murphy.
 While the bank has expanded beyond its fixed-income roots in Europe since acquiring Lehman, it’s still a laggard in the region.
 AT&T Chief Executive Officer Randall Stephenson told the Financial Times in 2010 there would be an “industrial logic” in his company acquiring DirecTV, even though he suspected regulators wouldn’t allow the transaction.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar Investment Authority is acquiring joint control of a group of luxury hotels in five European cities including the Carlton InterContinental in Cannes and Amsterdam’s Amstel InterContinental.
 The deal signifies that Apple Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook is willing to use the company’s $1506 billion in cash more aggressively, a departure from predecessor Steve Jobs’s playbook of acquiring smaller companies to bring in technology and talent.
 “Given the changing landscape and our view that Apple will have to eventually evolve its business model, we believe Apple should be acquiring more offensive assets to better position itself” Apple shares rose less than 1 percent to $62941 as of 9:36 am.
 An attorney who represents real estate investors and developers said the ruling raises a “serious concern” for lenders involved in foreclosures because they may not even know there are tenants in the properties they’re acquiring.
 Hodna Cement Co, in which PPC is acquiring a 49 percent stake, will produce 2 million tons of the construction material a year.
 is acquiring for $2 billion, was accused by ZeniMax Media Inc.
 Coca-Cola increased its stake in the maker of household coffee machines to 16 percent, three months after acquiring a 10 percent holding.
 Bondholder Recovery From a bondholder’s standpoint, it shouldn’t matter who is acquiring Stuyvesant Town as long as the value is fair and fully recovers mortgage principal and costs, according to Darrell Wheeler, a debt analyst at Amherst Securities, who estimates the property could be worth $46 billion to $5 billion.
 is acquiring mobile-device software startup Divide, adding services to help corporations manage employees’ use of smartphones and tablets.
 The carrier, controlled by Alisher Usmanov, Russia’s richest man, and part-owned by Sweden’s TeliaSonera AB, has been boosting revenue faster than local competitors after acquiring mobile-data operator Scartel last year.
 Mizkan has also expanded in Britain, acquiring the Branston range of pickles and sauces from Premier Foods Plc earlier this year.
 network, and Son has made no secret of his interest in acquiring T-Mobile US Inc.
 is acquiring Adometry Inc.
 Sprint and T-Mobile may face greater hurdles given that AT&T was blocked from acquiring T-Mobile in 2011, which would have shrunk the number of major wireless carriers from four to three, said Chris Sprigman, a New York University law professor and former Justice Department attorney.
 Consumer Food Products Rising incomes in nearby Asian markets have stoked interest in acquiring food-related companies in Australia, the fourth-biggest wheat exporter and third-largest shipper of beef.
 AT&T had previously explored wireless opportunities in Europe, such as acquiring Vodafone Group Plc.
 It expanded by starting and acquiring more schools and completed a $45 million initial public offering in 1996.
 “We would suspect that Vale, having undertaken a similar rebuild program at its Onca Puma, could be interested in acquiring the Barro Alto operations and may consider taking on the assets prior to the completion of any refurbishment program if that were to be reflected in the price,” the Deutsche analysts said in the report.
 By acquiring DirecTV, AT&T will get the scale to compete more effectively against a combined Comcast-Time Warner Cable, making that transaction appear less threatening to regulators, said Herbert Hovenkamp, a law professor at the University of Iowa.
 were fighting over acquiring it.
 The world’s biggest search provider said it’s acquiring Quest Visual Inc, whose Word Lens app lets users translate signs with their smartphone cameras.
 Fomento de Construcciones y Contratas SA is building the stadium in return for acquiring the site of the team’s current arena, Gil said.
 “We’re going to be acquiring lands,” Nunes said today in a telephone interview.
 Spain’s Bankinter SA may also be interested in acquiring parts of the division, said another person.
 Stock Decline Rising incomes in nearby Asian markets have stoked interest in acquiring food-related companies in Australia, the fourth-biggest wheat exporter and third-largest shipper of beef.
 Prenda Law Tatel criticized Prenda Law, noting that a judge in another case had described it as a “porno-trolling collective” that was seeking “easy money” by forming AF Holdings, acquiring rights to pornographic movies and initiating “massive ‘John Doe’ copyright infringement lawsuits” The firm “appears to have disbanded and then reconstituted itself in a similar form” since representing AF Holdings in the district court.
 While acquiring and canceling all of AT&T’s shares would give America Movil investors an 8 percent return, it would boost America Movil’s net debt to twice its annual earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, said Carlos de Legarreta, an analyst at Corporativo GBM SAB in Mexico City.
 Now he’s joined billionaires George Soros and John Paulson in acquiring shares in one of the real estate investment trusts buying property in the Irish capital, Dublin.
 “This appears to be the first time they are acquiring another brand, which hasn’t been their modus operandi,” said Todd Lowenstein, a money manager at Highmark Capital Management Inc.
 The company is in the process of acquiring Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV for 49 billion euros.
 “The solid balance that Mexichem has allows them to continue acquiring and remain effective in regards to mergers and acquisitions,” Perez, who has a hold rating on the stock, said in a phone interview.
 ICE is seeking to spin off Euronext after acquiring the exchange through its purchase of NYSE Euronext in November.
 Second Weapon Clarke bought BlinkBox in 2011, inspired by Amazon acquiring local rival Lovefilm.
 is acquiring for $2 billion, was accused by ZeniMax Media Inc.
 Bad loans have climbed to a six-year high as red tape stalled projects amid delays in acquiring land, obtaining environmental clearances and graft allegations.
 To stop Woolworths acquiring David Jones, Lew would need at least 25 percent of the company’s shareholders to oppose the offer.
 “You just don’t want to leave it to chance” Clarke, with a market value of C$1572 million ($1434 million), is focused “on acquiring undervalued or underperforming businesses with hard assets” and working with management to improve operations, according to a presentation on its website.
 Armed with the cash from Argentina and the proceeds of today’s deal, Repsol plans to spend as much as $10 billion acquiring oil and natural gas production assets, mainly in developed countries, Executive Chairman Antonio Brufau has said.
 A Telesat purchase would come in two pieces: buying publicly traded Loral, which owns 63 percent of the company, and acquiring the rest from Canada’s Public Sector Pension Investment Board, which co-owns the satellite operator, the people said last month.
 ITV has been reducing its dependence on advertising by investing in content creation and by acquiring production assets under CEO Crozier, the former head of Royal Mail Group Plc who took over in 2010.
 Alibaba will spend S$3125 million ($249 million) acquiring about 220 million new and existing shares and the companies will enter talks for an e-commerce logistics venture, the Singapore-based company said in a statement.
 Safra Sarasin, which had 131 billion francs under management at the end of 2013, is consolidating its presence in the country by acquiring the Swiss private bank of Morgan Stanley.
 in January after acquiring US.
 Sprint/T-Mobile Dish, which failed to buy Sprint last year, would be interested in acquiring T-Mobile if regulators block Sprint’s efforts, Ergen said.
 It’s in the process of acquiring the other half of the company through a deal announced in December.
 Paul Adams, president of jet engine maker Pratt & Whitney, said “many, many organizations and countries around the world” were interested in acquiring its technology.
 Profit Margins In acquiring Hillshire, Pilgrim’s would be getting a “pretty good deal,” said Craig Sterling, an analyst at EVA Dimensions in New York.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Citic Pacific Ltd, which is acquiring $36 billion of assets from its state-owned Chinese parent, agreed to sell $51 billion of shares to investors including the country’s social security fund.
 One of its predecessor companies, the old AT&T Corp, got into the cable-TV business in 1999, acquiring Tele-Communications Inc, only to sell the assets three years later to Comcast Corp.
 22 that the company is willing to spend $10 billion acquiring assets in Canada, the US.
 Debt Impact While acquiring and canceling all of AT&T’s shares would give America Movil investors an 8 percent return, it would boost America Movil’s net debt to twice its annual earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, said Carlos de Legarreta, an analyst at Corporativo GBM SAB in Mexico City.
 ‘Off We Go’ Slim is also losing a potential partner in Europe, where he is acquiring control of Telekom Austria AG and holds a minority stake in Dutch phone carrier Royal KPN NV.
 AT&T was said to be interested in acquiring Vodafone Group Plc since at least last year, a deal that would have given it networks across Europe to complement Slim’s holdings.
 Alibaba will spend S$3125 million ($249 million) acquiring about 220 million new and existing shares and the companies will enter talks for an e-commerce logistics venture, the Singapore-based company said in a statement.
 AT&T had previously explored wireless opportunities in Europe, such as acquiring Vodafone.
 “We are open to acquiring other millers and refiners.
 Close to half the world’s air traffic growth will involve Asian routes over the next 20 years, Boeing marketing chief Randy Tinseth has said, with carriers from the region acquiring 12,820 more aircraft, or 36 percent of the global total.
 Credit Suisse’s Spanish brokerage was the biggest net buyer, acquiring 37 million shares, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Companies in the Topix index are acquiring their own stock at the fastest pace ever, led by NTT Docomo Inc.
 New York-based Apollo committed as much as $400 million to Halcon Resources Corp, the oil and gas exploration and production company said yesterday, and Oaktree Capital Group LLC said it’s acquiring Highstar Capital to increase investments in energy projects and infrastructure.
 Acquiring Insurers Athene CEO Jim Belardi built his firm by acquiring insurers, most recently completing the purchase of Aviva Plc’s US.
 Deka, Germany’s biggest manager of real estate mutual funds, said in April it was interested in acquiring more office properties in Lisbon after buying a building, rented to postal service CTT-Correios de Portugal, for 43 million euros.
 Mountain View, California-based Google said June 10 it’s acquiring satellite company Skybox Imaging Inc.
 Google said it’s acquiring Appurify Inc, a provider of testing software for mobile applications.
 Globalfoundries is primarily interested in acquiring IBM’s engineers and intellectual property rather than manufacturing facilities, which have little value as they are more than a decade old, said people with knowledge of the matter who asked not to be named because the talks are private.
 The exchange operator is spinning off Euronext after acquiring it through the purchase of NYSE Euronext in November.
 Charter will be acquiring 14 million customers and a 33 percent ownership stake in a new, publicly traded independent cable company with 25 million subscribers, Justin Venech, a Charter spokesman, said in an e-mail.
 If a person or group already beneficially owns 15 percent or more of the common stock, the person won’t be deemed a so-called acquiring person unless an additional 1 percent of the company’s shares is purchased, American Apparel said.
 McDermott has been acquiring online software assets, shuffling management and cutting jobs.
 SAP has also been acquiring smaller software makers to bolster its product line.
 Emerging Markets China Mobile’s state-owned parent first expanded outside its home market by acquiring control of Millicom International Cellular SA’s Pakistan unit in 2007 for $284 million.
 Fuel Efficiency The company’s focus is on acquiring “young, modern, fuel-efficient aircraft that we believe will remain in strong demand,” Avolon said.
June 9 (Bloomberg) -- Family Dollar Stores Inc, facing a threat from billionaire activist Carl Icahn, adopted a shareholder-rights plan that will limit investors from acquiring more than 10 percent of the company.
 Neither the state governments nor the central government have the capacity to fund metro projects” Land Acquisition Perhaps the biggest hurdle they all face is acquiring land for the projects.
 private last year, said yesterday that it’s interested in acquiring the 901 percent of Express that it doesn’t already own.
 for $23 billion, its largest purchase since acquiring Berry Petroleum Co.
 “Linn is driving strategy and valuation based on acquiring assets that they perceive to have long life,” said Fadel Gheit, a New York-based analyst for Oppenheimer & Co.
 Georgia-born Filaret Galchev, Holcim’s second-largest shareholder and chairman of Moscow-based Eurocement Group, has spent $23 billion acquiring about 10 percent of Holcim since 2008, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 World Cup “Furniture and white-line goods companies should see more concentrated sales in the second half of the year, because consumers will be focused on acquiring televisions” before the World Cup, ratings company Moody’s wrote in a March report.
 Family Dollar, based in Matthews, North Carolina, responded with a poison pill that limits investors from acquiring more than 10 percent of the company.
 said it’s acquiring satellite company Skybox Imaging Inc.
 MBIA claimed the bank misrepresented the way it put protocols in place that were designed to avoid acquiring loans from “deficient originators,” and that the company didn’t correct its quality-control and repurchase practices.
 VF, Adidas VF Corp, the $27 billion owner of the Vans and the North Face brands, is one of the most likely candidates to consider acquiring Lululemon, said Canaccord Genuity Group Inc.
 It will spend about HK$18 billion on a Chow Tai Fook Jewellery park in China’s Wuhan and about HK$1 billion in acquiring an industrial building in Kwai Chung area in Hong Kong, he said.
 After acquiring Milan-based Pomellato last year, Kering may add to its jewelry portfolio, Sanford C.
 Riggio Plan Barnes & Noble’s founder and chairman, Leonard Riggio, made his own run at the business last year, announcing his intention to break up the company by acquiring its stores and website.
 HKT Ltd, a unit of billionaire Richard Li’s PCCW Ltd, fell 43 percent to HK$825 after saying it plans to raise $998 million through a rights issue for refinancing, including debt from acquiring the CSL mobile-phone business in Hong Kong.
 drugmaker, proposed acquiring London-based AstraZeneca Plc in part to get a UK.
 Lending Dislocation The firm is acquiring a range of unusual loans to “take advantage of some of the dislocation in the lending space, in terms of it not reaching a huge and underserved, but strong credit, population in the US,” he said.
 AGL will look at acquiring power assets in Queensland should they come up for sale, Fraser said today.
 (IOC), Total SA (FP)’s partner in a natural gas project in Papua New Guinea, said it’s been approached by companies interested in acquiring a stake in four nearby exploration licenses.
 Industrial Logic? “If lifitegrast doesn’t make it to the market, there is next-to-zero industrial logic in Allergan acquiring Shire as they operate in very different fields,” Clark said by phone.
 Vodafone could eventually move further into fields outside of transmitting calls and data by acquiring makers of hardware, such as sensors, Gordon said, adding that no such move is imminent.
 have agreed to spend $250 million acquiring a 50 percent share of BowLeven Plc’s Etinde Permit off the coast of Cameroon.
June 21 (Bloomberg) -- Google Inc’s Nest Labs is acquiring Dropcam Inc.
 Capital Increase Vivendi entered Brazil in 2009 by acquiring a controlling stake in GVT for $418 billion, topping a rival bid by Telefonica.
 New Age, where Steven Lowden is a founder, will become the project operator after acquiring an additional 125 percent stake from BowLeven.
 is acquiring Covidien Plc for $429 billion in part to gain its Irish tax domicile.
 Telefonica disposed of the securities for 1396 million euros, or a 36 percent gain since acquiring them seven months ago, according to Miguel Angel Garzon, a spokesman for the Madrid-based carrier.
June 13 (Bloomberg) -- Express Inc, a struggling clothing retailer that targets shoppers in their 20s, soared 21 percent after private-equity firm Sycamore Partners said it’s interested in acquiring the company.
 The poison pill hinders shareholders from acquiring a stake of 10 percent or more without the board’s consent, though it doesn’t prevent the company from considering or accepting an offer, Express said.
 Mitsubishi has approached Bouygues SA about acquiring a stake of as much as 10 percent in Alstom, a stake valued at about 900 million euros, CEO Shunichi Miyanaga told the lawmakers, adding that he wants the French state to also take a 10 percent stake in the French company to support the deal.
 VF, Adidas VF Corp, the $27 billion owner of the Vans and the North Face brands, is one of the most likely candidates to consider acquiring Lululemon, said Canaccord Genuity Group Inc.
 “The reality is that Imperial is in a better position to extract synergies than someone like Japan Tobacco because it already has a business there” A spokeswoman from Japan Tobacco International declined to comment when asked if the company had any interest in acquiring assets.
 Onex had been a supplier for the airline after acquiring its catering business, Sky Chefs, in 1986 and operating it for 16 years.
 SBC Communications took AT&T’s more widely recognizable name after acquiring the company in 2005.
 In a Reverse Morris Trust, the seller spins off a unit, which is then merged with the acquiring company by swapping stock.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- Citic Pacific Ltd, which is acquiring $36 billion of assets from its state-owned Chinese parent, said it will add new investors including Tencent Holdings Ltd.
 With the backing of AT&T, Slim got into Mexico’s telecommunications business by acquiring control of former state monopoly Telefonos de Mexico in a 1990 privatization sale.
 Oracle, based in Redwood City, California, came close to acquiring Micros about six years ago, according to one person with knowledge of the matter.
 Now, the government is turning again to Citic, this time to lure more private investment to inefficient state-owned enterprises and to aid its global ambitions by acquiring companies overseas.
 VF Corp, the $27 billion owner of the Vans and The North Face brands, is one of the most likely candidates to consider acquiring Lululemon, said Canaccord Genuity Group Inc.
 “By acquiring the Spotless Group, we will strengthen our market position and enter highly profitable growth segments,” the CEO said in the statement.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Rexam Plc, the largest drinks-can maker, plans to expand by renewing technology, cutting costs and acquiring more companies in the Middle East and Central America.
 Twitter, which has faced slowing user growth for its main application, has been acquiring companies to expand the potential audience for its advertisers.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Sycamore Partners, a private-equity firm that focuses on retail investments, said it’s interested in acquiring the struggling clothing chain Express Inc.
 Express, based in Columbus, Ohio, responded by adopting an anti-takeover plan that hinders shareholders from acquiring 10 percent or more of the company without the board’s consent.
 If a person or group already beneficially owns 15 percent or more of the common stock, the person won’t be deemed a so-called acquiring person unless an additional 1 percent of the company’s shares is purchased, American Apparel said.
 It asked the judge to affirm its right to call the meeting “to solicit shareholder views of Valeant’s proposal by voting on the removal of directors hostile to that proposal” ‘Acquiring Person’ In a June 11 letter to Pershing Square’s chief legal officer, Roy Katzovicz, Allergan lawyer Mark Gentile said such solicitation of proxies “should not, of itself, cause PS Fund to become an acquiring person” It “would be all but impossible” to answer all the concerns without “a fully developed factual record,” he said.
 The Redwood City, California-based software maker came close to acquiring Micros six years ago only for the deal to fall through at the last minute.
 The CEO missed out on acquiring Novartis AG’s animal-health business, which the Swiss company sold in April for $54 billion to US.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Lupin Ltd, the drugmaker founded by Indian billionaire Desh Bandhu Gupta, is seeking to build its business in Europe by acquiring generics manufacturers for as much as $1 billion.
 The Russian market continues to be a large, attractive market” Ranbaxy’s “leadership” in Russia and Romania, among other emerging markets, was cited as one of the ways Sun would benefit from acquiring the Gurgaon-based drugmaker.
 Discovery, partly owned by cable-TV billionaire John Malone, is seeking to become more competitive in sports after acquiring control of Eurosport this year.
 Until Merck’s purchase, companies had held off acquiring smaller developers such as Idenix and Achillion Pharmaceuticals.
 consumer set, and many food companies are responding to that either by developing healthy food alternatives or acquiring into the healthy food space,” Brett Hundley, an analyst at BB&T Capital Markets in Richmond, Virginia, said today in an interview.
 A subsidiary of McClendon’s company, known as American Energy - Permian Basin LLC, is acquiring about 63,000 acres in the formation from Enduring Resources LLC for $25 billion, the company said.
 Purchasing such properties and boosting their profitability is often easier than acquiring and remaking higher-end hotels.
 “We’re just economic investors, focused on providing the best returns for our limited partners, and these assets accomplish that” Goldman Sachs American Realty is acquiring the Equity Inns lodging portfolio from subsidiaries of Whitehall Real Estate Funds, which are sponsored by Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Patience Required Outside of Putnam, Great-West’s geared for increased profit from its European unit after acquiring Irish Life Group Ltd.
 “They’re expanding their addressable market and acquiring an asset that’s been growing revenues at a rapid clip,” said Bernardez, who recommends buying the stock.
 are interested in acquiring Barclays Plc’s index business and merging it with S&P Dow Jones Indices LLC -- manager of the benchmark S&P 500 Index and Dow Jones Industrial Average, according to people familiar with the matter.
 did so by acquiring existing participants in the market.
 Since users have to send a shot to receive a image, “it’s half about you expressing yourself and half about nudging the people you’re sharing with to say I also want to hear about you” Facebook, which has added to its mobile application arsenal by acquiring Instagram in 2012 and agreeing to pay about $19 billion for WhatsApp Inc.
 “Today’s raised offer reassures investors that the deal is going to close, this is a legit company and Shanghai Pudong is definitely serious about acquiring it,” Jay Srivatsa, a New York-based analyst with Chardan Capital Markets, said by phone.
 AMC, “we thought that someone acquiring those guys would be kind of the first response.
 and Amazoncom Inc, which also are taking stakes in or acquiring startups.
 is acquiring Wild Flavors GmbH for about 22 billion euros ($3 billion) as it seeks to diversify from grain processing and tap into the less volatile natural ingredients business.
 “The supply constraints are really going to start to hit home later in this decade and the supply-demand balance is going to roll over at some point in the not-too-distant future” First Quantum completed its biggest deal last year, acquiring Inmet Mining Corp.
 is acquiring graphics company DrawElements Ltd.
 It didn’t signal interest in acquiring the entire company.
 company sold its 83 percent stake in Slim’s carrier for $56 billion last month because it’s acquiring DirecTV, which competes with Mexico City-based America Movil for TV customers in South and Central America.
 Shire’s foreign tax domicile is “a critical component that gives them a little more power” By acquiring Shire, which splits operations between the US.
 “To say the least, this is a significant acquisition for Aecom, which is acquiring a company that is about 40 percent larger based on our 2014 revenue projections,” Thalhimer wrote in a note to clients today.
 Increasing Incomes Rising incomes in nearby Asian markets have stoked interest in acquiring food-related companies in Australia, the fourth-biggest wheat exporter and third-largest shipper of beef.
 The firm holds about 64 percent market share as of May 31, down from about 83 percent after acquiring Claymore, according to data from the Canadian ETF Association.
 China Qingdao International plans to buy the rest of the company after acquiring about 57 percent stake for HK$4287 million.
 In March, AMG said it was acquiring a minority stake in EIG Global Energy Partners LLC, and a stake in value-oriented investor River Road Asset Management.
 Holdings Enlarged Board members enlarged their holdings yesterday, with Co-Chairmen David Danziger and Allan Mayer and directors Robert Greene, William Mauer and Marvin Ingelman each acquiring 11,494 shares from American Apparel, according to regulatory filings.
 KKR, along with competitors such as Blackstone Group LP, is diversifying its business by acquiring stakes in hedge-fund firms.
 Chief Executive Officer Lowell McAdam considered buying Time Warner and then passed, not wanting to take on additional debt after acquiring the rest of Verizon Wireless earlier this year for $130 billion, according to people familiar with Verizon’s discussions.
 Pushing Margins In Spain, Telefonica is acquiring a cable television broadcaster to strengthen its position amid a battle for market share that has pushed the domestic mobile-phone industry’s profit margins down.
 The NSA was acquiring more than 250 million Internet communications and telephone conversations annually by 2011 under Prism and other data-collection efforts, according to the report.
 Since the package’s creation, JPMorgan has become the nation’s largest lender, acquiring Bears Stearns Cos.
 Telefonica said yesterday it was in talks to over a deal in Mexico, following an El Confidencial report that it was close to acquiring Grupo Iusacell SA.
 Global private-equity firms including Anacap Financial Partners LLP and Fortress Investment Group LLC have started acquiring at least 7 billion euros of the debt, according to data from PriceWaterHouseCoopers LLP.
 Goldcorp explored the possibility of acquiring mines in Ghana as part of the potential combination of Newmont and Barrick Gold Corp, said the people, who asked not to be named because the discussions were private.
 brands she’s acquiring, while pinning future growth aspirations on e-cigarettes, which brokerage Cowen and Co.
 and Martin Marietta Materials Inc, gained after becoming takeover targets or acquiring a rival.
 I never, ever felt that she had anybody’s interests other than ours first in line” By acquiring Shire, which splits operations between the US.
 In addition to investing in existing products, Google ramped up spending on acquiring new companies and businesses.
 More recently, the lender increased its bets by acquiring Trinidad and Tobago’s RBTT Financial Holdings Ltd.
 KKR, like competitors Blackstone Group LP and Carlyle Group LP, has diversified its business beyond leveraged buyouts, in part by acquiring stakes in hedge-fund firms.
 named Mark Hutchinson to lead the integration of Alstom SA’s energy units it’s acquiring in a $17 billion deal.
 GE is acquiring Alstom’s gas-turbine unit and creating joint ventures in the steam-turbine, renewable-energy and electrical-transmission businesses while selling its rail-signaling operations to Alstom.
 The broadcaster is reducing its dependence on advertising by investing in content and by acquiring production assets under Chief Executive Officer Adam Crozier, the former head of Royal Mail who took over in 2010.
 New Channels Last month, Slim increased his investment in America Movil to 57 percent of the company after acquiring AT&T’s 83 percent stake for $557 billion.
 said it’s acquiring Newsle Inc, a startup that highlights news about people in a user’s professional and social networks.
 To do so, he plans to cut costs as the two companies join, and build the business in brand-name drugs by acquiring treatments for gastrointestinal and central nervous system disorders.
 Companies are finding all kinds of ways to escape America’s 35 percent corporate rate, from acquiring a mailbox in Ireland to using a 54-year-old tax break originally meant to allow middle-class people to invest in real estate.
 1990 Privatization Slim got into Mexico’s telecommunications business by acquiring control of former state monopoly Telefonos de Mexico in a 1990 privatization sale.
 The French company is accused of delaying generic entry by acquiring competing technologies to produce perindopril and also entering into settlements with generic rivals.
 Progress Residential, which has more than 10,000 homes in 12 states, is shifting purchases to parts of the country where home values have seen fewer gains, and acquiring newly-constructed houses along with nonperforming loans, known as NPLs, according to President Curt Schade.
 is acquiring Covidien Plc for $429 billion in part to gain its Irish tax domicile.
 Rakuten Inc, Japan’s biggest online mall operator, announced in February it was acquiring Viber Media Ltd.
 If you are a foreign investor or a foreign migrant the rules are exactly the same when it comes to acquiring Portuguese nationality” The progress of anti-immigration parties such as Marine Le Pen’s National Front in France and Nigel Farage’s UK.
 No Bankers One thing that distinguishes Jacobs from other CEOs on acquiring sprees: he doesn’t use bankers.
 “The company confirms that it has been approached by third parties with a potential interest in acquiring the company,” according to the statement.
 Ace Chief Executive Officer Evan Greenberg has built the company by acquiring assets in regions including Asia and Latin America.
 “I don’t want the marketing of my listings and my ability to sell them -- or not -- to be dominated by one company” Zillow said this week it is acquiring San Francisco-based Trulia, the second-biggest real estate website, for about $35 billion in stock.
 is considering acquiring a stake in Canadian wireless provider Wind Mobile, people with knowledge of the matter said, as Canada continues its effort to create a fourth national carrier.
 “The ruling increases the risks associated with Russia” Rosneft became the nation’s largest oil producer by acquiring most of Yukos’s assets at a series of forced auctions.
 That will let Televisa continue acquiring pay-TV companies without the regulator’s authorization, strengthening its influence over programming and pricing, Javier Corral, a lawmaker for the opposition National Action Party, said in the Senate last week.
 Valeant Leverage Valeant’s debt level relative to earnings wouldn’t change “materially” after acquiring Allergan, David Kaplan, an analyst with Standard & Poor’s, said in a phone interview.
 Then in December 2012, Harper unveiled the rules to prevent state-owned enterprises from acquiring control of oil sands businesses, even as he approved the Cnooc-Nexen deal.
 You can’t not take a stand” Ben & Jerry’s has never shied away from speaking out on social issues, and Unilever, since acquiring the company in 2000, has not interfered.
 Sinclair, based in Hunt Valley, Maryland, is acquiring TV stations owned by the Allbritton family for $985 million, while Gannett bought Belo Corp, another TV station group, for $203 billion in December.
 Twitter, which has faced slowing user growth for its main application, has been acquiring companies to expand the potential audience for its advertisers.
 is acquiring DirecTV, the largest satellite-TV provider, and Comcast Corp.
 He said he was “hopeful that one or more of them will surface as a result of today’s announcement” After Icahn announced his stake, Family Dollar adopted a shareholder-rights plan that limited investors from acquiring more than 10 percent of the company, a move to prevent a hostile takeover.
 Rosneft complied with the law in acquiring Yukos subsidiaries and doesn’t expect the decision to “negatively affect its commercial activity or assets,” the oil producer said in a website statement.
 Tumultuous Decade Whitworth turned his attention to Hewlett-Packard in 2011, acquiring a stake after the company’s disastrous purchase of software maker Autonomy Corp.
 After acquiring Pfizer Inc’s consumer business in 2006, though, the flood of recalls began.
 The Armonk, New York-based company is nearing a deal to sell the chip-manufacturing business to Globalfoundries Inc, which is primarily interested in acquiring the unit’s engineers and intellectual property, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 Last month, Bloomberg News reported that Globalfoundries was primarily interested in acquiring IBM’s engineers and intellectual property rather than manufacturing facilities, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 “Fosun is the closest in our view” Other Chinese entrepreneurs acquiring more overseas include Jack Ma, founder of China’s largest e-commerce company Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, which this year bought stakes in messaging service TangoMe Inc.
 Prospective investments abroad typically have a Chinese angle, according to Guo, such as acquiring a brand that can be introduced on the mainland or expertise that can be brought to bear serving China’s growing middle class.
 EQT, part-owned by the Wallenberg family and sporting about 7 billion euros ($95 billion) in available funds, has spent recent months acquiring fiber assets to consolidate the country’s more than 200 local networks, just as more Swedes start using streaming services such as Netflix.
 With Niel as a new owner, T-Mobile would still face the same obstacles in challenging its larger competitors, including difficulty acquiring nationwide wireless spectrum, or the airwaves that carry calls and data, said Benedict Evans, a partner at Andreessen Horowitz.
 It got the rights to the flu treatment in 2008 by acquiring a controlling stake in Japanese drugmaker Toyama Chemical Co.
 Internet companies are acquiring startups to bolster their existing businesses.
 for $23 billion, its largest purchase since acquiring Berry Petroleum Co.
 “It’s a huge intervention and the advantage with acquiring one of the existing banks is that you have the infrastructure” No Muscle Postbank, a state company linked to the Post Office that mainly distributes welfare payments, doesn’t have the infrastructure or the “muscle,” he said.
 Years of operational inefficiency and delays in acquiring land and environmental approvals has left Coal India without new mines.
 Deal Landscape There’s been more buyouts in the pay-TV industry, and programmers say they’re concerned they may have to follow suit, bulking up to maintain negotiating leverage with content buyers like Comcast, which is acquiring Time Warner Cable Inc.
 It reported acquiring put option contracts on almost $940 million worth of shares in the S&P 500 and Energy Select ETFs during the second quarter.
 rallied yesterday amid speculation they could be the next targets, after Infineon announced it’s acquiring one of their closest peers for an above-average premium of 56 percent.
 Earlier this month, it said it was acquiring smartphone-messaging application Emu and video-creation service Directr Inc, bolstering its mobile and advertising capabilities.
 The sale effort comes during a period of consolidation in the grocery business with larger players such as Kroger and Cerberus, which is also in the process of acquiring Safeway Inc, buying rivals to build market share and lower costs.
 “The demand for the site demonstrated that there is significant international interest in acquiring prime London assets and we are capitalizing on this opportunity,” Heron International Chief Executive Officer Gerald Ronson said in a statement.
 E-Commerce Strategy Tencent folded its own e-commerce assets into JDcom after acquiring a 15 percent stake in the competitor of Alibaba in March and has been directing traffic from its chat services to generate more business.
 “You have more and more firms acquiring licenses,” Abu Dhabi-based Fathi Ben Grira, chief executive officer of Mena Corp, said by phone yesterday.
 For Starwood Waypoint, the loan purchases are a “great channel” for acquiring homes at a discount, said Gary Beasley, the company’s co-chief executive officer.
 is acquiring PrivateCore, a startup that makes software for protecting data, to strengthen the security of its systems.
 Oracle, under CEO Larry Ellison, has been acquiring cloud-computing companies and in June released a version of its 12c database software which uses computer memory to process business transactions and analyze data using the same tools -- the same idea behind Hana.
 Cantor Real Estate LP is acquiring RREP Recovery Partners Manager LLC, Cantor Fitzgerald said in a statement.
 Artspace gained access to about half of its list by acquiring the VIP Art Fair in 2013.
 Intellectual Property Bloomberg News reported in June that Globalfoundries was primarily interested in acquiring IBM’s engineers and intellectual property rather than manufacturing facilities, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 A representative for Dish and a press official for America Movil declined to comment on their possible interest in acquiring T-Mobile.
 Lawsky is probing possible conflicts of interest at Atlanta-based Ocwen, which has grown in recent years by acquiring the mortgage-servicing rights to distressed loans from large banks.
 isn’t giving up on striking an overseas takeover to cut its tax rate and gain a new pipeline of drugs, even as the potential cost of acquiring AstraZeneca Plc rises.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Zillow Inc, the real estate website that’s acquiring smaller rival Trulia Inc.
 Fiat began acquiring Chrysler in 2009 as part of a government and labor-union bailout of the US.
 The 17 communities Health Care REIT is acquiring in the Mainstreet deal are under the Next Generation brand and include a mix of post-acute and assisted-living beds and rehabilitation space.
 Delta Air Lines Inc, the world’s third-largest carrier, is trimming maintenance costs by acquiring older planes on the cheap for parts.
 Telecom Italia Telecom Italia SpA rose 11 percent to 812 euro cents after people familiar with the matter said it is pursuing an alliance with Vivendi SA that could lead to the French media company acquiring a significant stake in Italy’s largest phone carrier.
 Changwon, Korea-based STX is selling the Turku shipyard in Finland, with German shipbuilder Meyer Werft GmbH acquiring 70 percent of the business and the Finnish government the remainder.
 The firm was created in 2009 when Burgess, a former Morgan Stanley investment banker, and three other investors took over the Community Bank of Manatee, ultimately acquiring other lenders in the state.
 Son, the chairman of Tokyo-based SoftBank Corp, took on a riskier asset, acquiring struggling Sprint Corp.
 is acquiring Gecko Design Inc.
 “The majority of Russians appear to be ready to sacrifice their economic welfare if it serves a bigger goal, which is now to show that Russia is again acquiring the trappings of a big power” Putin’s approval ratings took off on the back of his actions in Ukraine, first by bailing out then-President Viktor Yanukovych in December and then seizing Crimea after months of deadly protests that toppled the regime in Kiev.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Telecom Italia SpA is pursuing an alliance with Vivendi SA that could lead to the French media company acquiring a significant stake in Italy’s largest phone carrier, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 They’ve still dropped 66 percent since July 14, the day before the company said it would spend $71 billion on acquiring tobacco and the Blu e-cigarette brands jettisoned by the $25 billion Reynolds/Lorillard Inc.
 Chief Executive Officer Paul Bulcke spent $5 billion this year to build the dermatology business, acquiring the rest of its Galderma joint venture and rights to drugs from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Foreign banks may be interested in acquiring Asya Katilim Bankasi AS, its chief executive officer said, after announcing that profits have plunged since the bank came under pressure from the government for its alleged links to a US-based Islamic preacher.
 CEO Ahmet Beyaz also said Bank Asya would hold off chasing up overtures from abroad until it spoke with TC Ziraat Bankasi AS, a state bank he said is also interested in acquiring the Istanbul-based Islamic lender.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Barry Diller is betting that smartphone-tethered teens can stem falling sales at Askcom by acquiring Askfm, a social network that lets users pose anonymous questions.
 Facebook this week said it’s acquiring PrivateCore, a startup that makes software for protecting data, to strengthen the security of its systems.
 Still, acquiring one of the companies would be a break with tradition for Wal-Mart, which doesn’t typically buy rival chains in the US.
 - Berkshire Hathaway was fined $900,000 for violating reporting requirement in acquiring USG Corp.
 It expanded its branches across the country to more than 200 after acquiring outlets from OAO Sberbank.
 The firm was created in 2009 when Burgess, a former Morgan Stanley investment banker, and three other investors took over the Community Bank of Manatee, ultimately acquiring other lenders in the state.
 Spun-Off Stores “If Dollar General wins, Dollar Tree might end up acquiring many of the stores Dollar General spins off,” Gordon said.
 Earlier this year, Eli Broad, the co-founder of KB Home, told Los Angeles Magazine that he and Beutner were looking into acquiring the newspaper.
 When the lawsuit was dismissed, Cutrale figured there was no longer a legal risk in acquiring Chiquita, said the person, who asked not to be named because the discussions are private.
 Its parent company first expanded outside its home market by acquiring control of Millicom International Cellular SA’s Pakistan unit in 2007 for $284 million, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Google Inc, owner of the world’s most popular Internet search engine, is acquiring smartphone-messaging application Emu and video-creation service Directr Inc, bolstering its mobile and advertising capabilities.
 Even so, Syracuse, New York-based Carrols plans to continue acquiring restaurants.
 Acquiring an overseas rival using stock is called a tax inversion deal because it changes allows the acquiring company to use the target’s tax rate on overseas income and any cash brought back to the US.
 “Even though Carlos Slim has suggested that he’s not interested in acquiring a US.
 You can’t not take a stand” Ben & Jerry’s has never shied away from speaking out on social issues, and Unilever, since acquiring the company in 2000, has not interfered.
 “Acquirers have tended to be risk-averse and have looked for later stage assets when they’re acquiring something,” Carr said in a phone interview.
 “It can generate cost synergies by acquiring Cubist and stripping out its sales force and research expenditures,” she said.
 On an earnings call this week, chief executive officer Ahmet Beyaz confirmed that state-owned TC Ziraat Bankasi AS was interested in acquiring the lender.
 Wall Street buyers are acquiring the debt after foreclosure starts dropped this year to the lowest level since 2006 and house values soared in California, Phoenix and other markets hard-hit by the real estate crash.
 “We know the company is leveraged and it went on an investment spree, acquiring assets across geographies,” Sebastien Henin, who oversees $90 million as head of asset management at the National Investor in Abu Dhabi, said today by telephone.
 to gain a foothold in home automation, is acquiring SmartThings, a startup that makes makes mobile applications to remotely control devices in houses.
 It may use the free land it already has available, to get around the challenges of acquiring new land, the people said.
 Alibaba Stake He’s since been expanding, including the purchase of Sprint and acquiring a 34 percent stake in Chinese e-commerce company Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, which began trading in New York last week.
 would take measures to ensure foreign-owned firms preserve jobs or plants after acquiring UK.
 14 that Doyen CEO Lucashad exerted “illegitimate pressure” on the club to tradeMarcos Rojo after acquiring a 75 percent stake in the Argentinedefender’s transfer rights, and met with other teams with a viewto him being traded.
 “We continue to think it’s more around them acquiring companies, as well as potentially changing the ownership stake in VMware” Dave Farmer, a spokesman for Hopkinton, Massachusetts-based EMC, said the company isn’t commenting on speculation.
 There are about 500 mobile game developers in Japan, in addition to individuals and small hobby groups, and their biggest challenge is acquiring new users globally, according to Serkan Toto, the Tokyo-based founder of consultant Kantan Games Inc.
 At Hewlett-Packard, Hurd brought financial discipline to a company that had performed inconsistently after acquiring Compaq Computer Corp.
 That could include the backers acquiring preferred stock and the right to nominate board members.
 Indesit Takeover The purchase by Electrolux comes only two months after Whirlpool increased its market leadership by acquiring a controlling stake in Italian appliance maker Indesit Co.
 would take measures to ensure foreign-owned firms preserve jobs or plants after acquiring UK.
 He’s been in retail even longer, acquiring the Sanborns retail chain in the early 1980s.
 Investors of the target company will receive 10126 BB&T shares and $940 in cash for each of their shares, the acquiring firm said today in a statement.
 Fifth Third Bancorp CEO Kevin Kabat said he plans to focus on growing his business instead of acquiring new ones.
 BAT has been selling Vype e-cigarettes for more than a year in the UK, while rival Imperial Tobacco Group Plc is acquiring Blu, the world’s biggest e-cigarette maker.
 Three major land transactions were concluded in Thane in the last two years with developers acquiring industrial land to build homes.
 and Canadian private-equity firms had explored the possibility of acquiring VimpelCom’s stake in Wind in recent months.
 (GOOG) is acquiring health-technology startup Lift Labs to add to its Google X researchunit, as the company pursues new methods to addressneurodegenerative diseases such as Parkinson’s.
 IHH is also interested in expanding into niche areas of the health-care industry by acquiring expertise, especially in developed markets, he said.
 Vivendi is interested in acquiring Telefonica SA’s 11 percent holding in Mediaset Premium, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the deliberations are private.
 BlackBerry jumped 61 percent after acquiring a mobile technology company to shore up its smartphone management features as it targets business users.
 BlackBerry advanced 61 percent to C$1191, the most since June, after acquiring London-based Movirtu Ltd, which has developed a technology that allows users to connect more than one phone number to a single device.
 That gives it endurance and is one reason acquiring its maker could be a good bet for Microsoft Corp, said Michael Pachter, an analyst with Wedbush Securities Inc.
 A case can also be made for acquiring Yahoo! Inc, which owns a stake in Alibaba, though other transactions are more likely, said Yahoo shareholder Ironfire Capital LLC.
 By acquiring Heineken, SABMiller would add more than $25 billion in sales and bolster its presence in emerging markets including Africa and Mexico, while helping keep control over its future.
 “There is a very real and material risk that the transaction proposed by Dollar General would fail to close, after a lengthy and disruptive review process” In a response today, Dollar General said it was still committed to acquiring Family Dollar.
 ‘Number One’ “The worry for me is they’re not acquiring these companies out of cash flow,” Neuhauser said.
 Rejecting Sellers Vontobel, which has said for at least three years it would be interested in acquiring private banks in Switzerland or asset management firms in or outside the country, has declined potential purchases “a number of times” this year, Staub said, without disclosing more details.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- UBM Plc, the publisher of InformationWeek, confirmed it’s in talks about acquiring trade-show organizer Advanstar to bolster its events business.
 to “unlock value” In a letter today to Yahoo Chief Executive Officer Marissa Mayer, the New York-based fund said the Web company should also cut losses in its display-ad business by $250 million to $500 million, stop acquiring other companies and instead discuss a deal with AOL.
 Mayer has tried to shore up Yahoo’s business by acquiring startups and investing in content and services to woo more Internet users and attract advertisers.
 Europe Quest America Movil has been acquiring assets abroad to offset the pressure in Mexico.
 Lehman Purchase Barclays experienced rapid growth after acquiring Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s wealth-management business in September 2008 and its compliance procedures didn’t keep pace with the expansion, the SEC said.
 considered acquiring the Weather Channel in 2012 as part of a tax-efficient asset swap with Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 We still may see such discussions initiated” Rusal, the world’s largest aluminum producer, accumulated part of its $10 billion of debt when acquiring the Norilsk stake in 2008.
 In the 2000s as he saw thelandscape changing, he changed his strategy and startedacquiring companies” “The only other entrepreneur I can think of who couldchange his stripes like that is Steve Jobs.
 has been interested in acquiring Vodafone Group Plc, the Newbury, England-based mobile-phone company with a 534 billion-pound market valuation, people familiar with that situation said in January.
 Goldman analyst Tim Boddy, citing the closed-door presentation, said in a note that Vodafone may consider a “transformational” M&A deal in “the longer term” Vodafone, the second-largest mobile-phone carrier by subscribers, spent the past two years acquiring cable and broadband providers in Germany and Spain to help stem declining wireless service revenue.
 We can be “opportunistic” in acquiring new positions, sheadded.
 “New apartments are filling up about twice as fast as they are in other parts of the country” Diller began developing and acquiring real estate in the mid-1960s after getting a law degree from the University of San Francisco.
 She has been acquiring startups and investing in content and services to woo more Internet users and attract advertisers.
Investor AB (INVEB), the holding company ofSweden’s Wallenberg family, raised its stake in Waertsilae Oyj (WRT1V),acquiring 158 million shares in the Finnish power plant andship engine maker for about 639 million euros ($824 million).
 Actavis, which is run from Parsippany, New Jersey, obtained an Irish tax domicile by acquiring Warner Chilcott Plc last year.
 is planning an Internet-based offering by mid-2015 after acquiring the supporting technology from Intel Corp.
 14 Doyen CEO Lucas hadexerted “illegitimate pressure” on the club to trade MarcosRojo after acquiring a 75 percent stake in the Argentinedefender’s transfer rights, and met with other teams with a viewto him being traded.
 ‘Unlock Value’ In his letter yesterday to Yahoo CEO Marissa Mayer, Smith said the Web company should explore a combination with AOL to “unlock value,” cut losses in its display-ad business by $250 million to $500 million, and stop acquiring other companies.
 Actavis, which is run from Parsippany, New Jersey, obtained an Irish tax domicile by acquiring Warner Chilcott Plc last year.
 Purchasing such properties and boosting their profitability is often easier than acquiring more upscale hotels with higher operating costs and lower returns.
 Fosun will own 851 percent of the vehicle, U-Tour 75 percent, Ardian 5 percent, and Club Med management 25 percent, based on acquiring 50 percent of the shares.
 Mayer has tried to shore up Yahoo’s business by acquiring startups and investing in content and services to woo more Internet users and attract advertisers.
 BASF’s Wintershall is acquiring a share in two producing fields, two development projects, the Polarled pipeline project and a share in four exploration licenses, the Ludwigshafen, Germany-based company said today in an e-mailed statement.
 Filmmaker Casey Neistat released a short documentary online showing people sleeping on the sidewalk outside an Apple store to be among the first line, acquiring two iPhones apiece in cash, then selling them immediately outside of the store.
 “By acquiring fixed-line assets, mobile operators are better able to bundle in fixed line to protect revenue” The deal also would increase the companies’ reach in Germany, where Vodafone and Liberty’s assets are limited to regional coverage, and will give Vodafone an Internet product for consumers in the UK, “one of the biggest gaps in its market,” the analysts wrote.
 Affiliates of Norges Bank Investment Management, which manages the Norwegian government’s global pension fund, is acquiring 45 percent interests the buildings from Boston Properties Inc, the seller said yesterday in a statement.
 In response, Epiq adopted a poison pill to discourage anyone acquiring more than 10 percent of its stock, and said it would explore all strategic options.
 Netflix first started out renting DVDs, then began acquiring Web-streaming rights to library movies and TV shows.
 “We have been more successful in acquiring new discoveries than making them,” Chief Financial Officer Patrick de La Chevardiere told journalists today.
 Mayer Tries Mayer has tried to shore up Yahoo’s business by acquiring startups and investing in content and services to woo more Internet users and attract advertisers.
 Microsoft is acquiring Mojang AB, the software companybehind the popular game Minecraft, for $25 billion, in a bid toboost its Xbox and mobile businesses.
 Last week, New York-based Starboard said that the Web portal should cut losses in its display-ad business, stop acquiring other companies and discuss a deal with AOL, which could deliver cost cuts of as much as $1 billion.
 China’s largest sovereign wealth fund took a stake in Noble in 2009, acquiring 573 million shares for S$21137 each, according to a filing.
 (GIS), the maker ofCheerios and Yoplait, is acquiring Berkeley, California-basedAnnie’s Inc.
 SL Green paid the equivalent of $390 a square foot when acquiring its stake in 2011.
 “These actions, in turn, led to lower average revenue per subscriber and an increase in bad debt expense” Adding Airwaves The company had been acquiring airwaves in Brazil and Mexico, betting demand for smartphones that use faster Internet speeds would grow.
 (AIG) are among companies that have been burned by lower-than-expected returns after acquiring books of life policiesThe investors take over premium payments and count on eventuallycollecting the death benefit.
 Randgold and AngloGold gained control of the Kibali mine by acquiring Moto Goldmines Ltd.
 Intellectual Property Bloomberg News reported in June that Globalfoundries was primarily interested in acquiring IBM’s engineers and intellectual property rather than manufacturing facilities, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 O’Rourke deserves another apology from us and we’re making this one publicly” Comcast and Time Warner Cable Inc, the rival cable operator that it’s acquiring for $452 billion, consistently receive low marks in customer-satisfaction surveys in the US.
 plans to resume its share repurchasing program, damping speculation that the company might still consider acquiring EMC Corp.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Ann Inc, owner of the Ann Taylor clothing chain, rose the most since August after disclosing it had entered into a confidentiality agreement with a private-equity firm that has a history of acquiring retailers.
 Any entity acquiring shares in the offering would have its voting rights limited to about 35 percent of the stock.
 At the end of it, Chief Executive Officer Daniel Hajj responded ambiguously when an analyst asked to confirm whether America Movil was interested in acquiring T-Mobile US Inc, the fourth-largest US.
 Other Deals After shelving the idea of acquiring Vodafone Group Plc earlier this year and then declaring that the acquisition window was closing in Europe, AT&T quickly shifted its attention to Latin America.
 The agency barred Flagstar from acquiring new mortgage servicing rights until it complies with regulations, making good on an August promise to scrutinize rights transfers.
 Japan Tobacco has also diversified into electronic cigarettes, acquiring in June the closely held Zandera Ltd, a UK-based maker of the so-called “e-cigarettes” which uses liquid nicotine and are typically smokeless.
 agreed in April to pay $15 billion for a majority of Noble Group Ltd’s agricultural trading unit, after acquiring control of Dutch grain trader Nidera BV two months earlier.
 will “play well outside of China” and can grow organically and by acquiring other companies.
 “What we’re acquiring in the Permian is really the upside and the opportunity,” said Jay Averill, a spokesman for Encana.
 Intellectual Property Throughout the talks, Globalfoundries has been primarily interested in acquiring IBM’s engineers and intellectual property, rather than the manufacturing facilities, people with knowledge of the matter said in June.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Fifty years since acquiring its first North Sea license, BP Plc is preparing to start a 700 million-pound ($11 billion) project in the region that’s expected to produce oil and gas into the next decade.
 banker Trevor Loewensohn, acquiring existing housing parks and sites to convert, and finance companies including GE Capital planning to start lending to operators.
 “We are not interested in acquiring yesterday’s technology or acquiring growth,” Sikka said in an interview at Bloomberg’s New York headquarters.
 “We were not in the cloud as they were ascending” Now, McDermott is positioning customer-management and e-commerce software SAP already owns against Salesforce while acquiring online-only providers such as Concur Technologies Inc.
 It’s increasing manganese exports while enjoying lower energy costs after acquiring a power plant.
 For much of McClendon’s reign, Chesapeake focused on acquiring properties.
 Actavis is run from Parsippany, New Jersey, but obtained an Irish domicile by acquiring Warner Chilcott Plc last year.
 “We are acquiring a low risk, well-managed, ongoing business concern that will add value to the group,” Bakke said.
 Starboard CEO Jeffrey Smith wrote in a letter that Yahoo should also cut losses in its display-ad business, stop acquiring other companies and instead discuss a deal with AOL, which could deliver cost cuts of as much as $1 billion, the fund said.
 The deepening ties between two of the five permanent members of the United Nations Security Council may reverberate beyond the region as Putin moves to meet one of China’s key military goals: acquiring cutting-edge technology.
 MetLife CEO Steve Kandarian has been expanding the insurer’s reach outside the US, acquiring Chilean pension provider AFP Provida SA last year for about $18 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “One of the things that we concluded was that nimbleness and speed is going to be an important part of the future” She added that “even in a software-defined world, you want to make sure you’ve got great hardware to run your software” EMC Talks The shape of the new company may change if Hewlett-Packard concludes a deal with storage maker EMC Corp, which it held talks about acquiring, people familiar with the discussions said last month.
 Even though its operational headquarters are in Parsippany, New Jersey, Actavis obtained an Irish tax domicile by acquiring Warner Chilcott Plc last year.
 Valeant, which has built its entire business by acquiring companies and cutting research and development spending and other costs, said it would find about $27 billion in savings.
 company acquiring a company in the same space with a very good international presence,” Charles Weston, an analyst at Numis Securities in London, said about the transaction.
 Twitter has been working to develop sources of revenue besides advertising after acquiring data-stream partner Gnip for $134 million this year.
 Marine Harvest is also open to more deals after acquiring bankrupt Chilean farmer Acuinova SA this year, Aarskog said.
 will become the second-largest salmon farmer after acquiring Cermaq in a $14 billion deal.
 Comcast and Time Warner Cable Inc, the rival cable operator that its acquiring for $452 billion, consistently receive low marks in customer-satisfaction surveys in the US.
 Japanese companies are reacquiring their stock after PrimeMinister Shinzo Abe unleashed policies to stop them sitting oncash in a nation exiting deflation.
 TransCanada is acquiring three 10-megawatt solar plants, which have begun generating power, the Calgary-based pipeline company said today in a statement.
 The company, which is run from Parsippany, New Jersey, and obtained an Irish tax domicile by acquiring Warner Chilcott Plc last year, agreed to buy Durata Therapeutics Inc.
 MTN and Vodacom are interested in acquiring a minority stake in Unitel, Angola’s largest wireless carrier, said three of the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 Portuguese Assets Oi has been working on a sale of its stake in Africatel after acquiring it earlier this year as part of its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Companies such as Valeo SA, France’s second-biggest auto-parts maker, may look at acquiring part or all of Clichy, France-based Montupet, the person said.
 In August, Samsung said it was acquiring SmartThings, a startup that make mobile applications to control devices in houses.
 The government can unilaterally extend the review for 30 days and can extend it further with the consent of the acquiring company.
 Mahindra, which began making scooters in 2008 after acquiring Kinetic Motor Co, is seeking to compete with Hero MotoCorp Ltd.
 Any entity acquiring shares in the offering would have its voting rights limited to about 35 percent of the stock.
 The investment firm is acquiring the parent company of VelocityShares, which was founded in 2009 and offers products including exchange-traded funds and notes that track swings in market volatility, according to an e-mailed statement today.
 Canadian Pacific is open to acquiring assets such as grain elevators, he also said.
 Shares in Medtronic Inc, the world’s biggest maker of heart rhythm devices, which is acquiring Covidien Plc in another inversion, slipped 15 percent to $6254.
 Son has competed with Ergen on deals in the past and is also interested in acquiring T-Mobile.
 Southeast in 2010 by acquiring South Financial Group Inc.
 of Ludhiana, India, of using knowledge gained from documents examined when the Indian company was contemplating acquiring a majority stake in the German company, the Business Standard reported.
 “Revel is a brand-new trophy asset on the beachfront, which we are acquiring at a substantial discount to replacement cost,” Coley said.
 Allergan filed its request overnight in federal court in Santa Ana, California, where it is litigating claims Ackman engaged in insider trading by acquiring his shares based on non-public knowledge of Valeant’s plans to bid for Allergen.
 Robbins recommended the stock today in Toronto at the Sohn Canada Conference presented by Capitalize for Kids, saying the company offers an attractive tax rate, after it obtained an Irish tax domicile by acquiring Warner Chilcott Plc last year.
 Froneman wants to make the company’s dividend sustainable beyond 2028, when his mines begin to expire, by acquiring assets, including in platinum.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- United Photovoltaics Group Ltd, a Chinese solar-farm operator, reduced its target for acquiring projects this year because of stiffer competition for projects and a slower negotiation process.
 Tokyo-based SoftBank, run by Masayoshi Son, has been looking at acquiring access to a variety of films, TV shows and online programming for networks it controls, including Sprint Corp.
 “The cost of acquiring will go up.
 In March, AMG said it was acquiring a minority stake in EIG Global Energy Partners LLC, and a stake in value-oriented investor River Road Asset Management.
 “They are acquiring stakes in the most promising prospects that would previously have been bought by international oil companies, such as BP and Shell,” he said.
 For us this is a logical expansion into renewables” The company expects to look into acquiring other types of renewable energy projects, Domenech said, and is considering hydroelectric power, hybrid power systems and residential, commercial and industrial solar power assets.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Chow Tai Fook Jewellery Group Ltd, the world’s largest listed jeweler, is considering acquiring stakes in diamond mines to secure long-term supply of the gems as demand in China for the precious stone grows.
 Carter also addressed whether Pershing Square violatedinsider-trading rules by acquiring Allergan stock whilepreparing a bid with Valeant.
 In May, the QIA was among investors who bought $51 billion of shares in Citic Pacific Ltd, which was acquiring assets from its parent as part of China’s drive to restructure state-owned enterprises.
 Brookfield Property Partners LP and TPG Capital also have been acquiring such assets in the past two years.
 BNSF is adding 800 trailer and container parking spaces at three Chicago hub terminals, installing 150 more heaters to keep switches from freezing and acquiring two industrial-size snow blowers.
 Twitter said in a regulatory filing today that a September convertible bond offering it held “could deter or prevent a third party from acquiring us even when the acquisition may be favorable to our stockholders or holders of the notes” Debtholders can require the company to repurchase their holdings if something goes wrong, and Twitter can’t agree to be sold unless the acquirer assumes the liability, the company said.
 Ergen has touted plans for an upcoming Internet-TV service and discussed interest in acquiring more assets, such as wireless spectrum or potentially T-Mobile US Inc.
 The company has said it’s interested in acquiring more mobile airwaves, including holdings of LightSquared Inc.
 Feeding on castoffs has allowed smaller lenders to sidestep pitfalls of acquiring whole firms including regulatory delays and crisis-era liabilities.
 The Minneapolis-based firm isn’t interested in acquiring an entire bank even as it remains open to smaller acquisitions such as buying branches, Davis said.
 Jarden’s annual revenue has surged -- from $305 million in 2001 when Franklin joined as chairman and CEO, to an estimated $817 billion this year -- with what Franklin said was a consistent strategy of acquiring market-leading, niche consumer brands.
 The company is renowned for its stealth in acquiring large positions in promising new drilling areas well before their potential is recognized by the broader market, said Ed Hirs, who teaches courses on energy economics at the University of Houston.
 Autlan has saved around $45 million in electricity costs this year after acquiring Cia.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Sohucom Inc, owner of China’s third-largest search engine, rose to a one-month high yesterday amid reports that it is acquiring an online video platform to expand its business model.
 They ended up acquiring more than two-thirds of the 45 properties, he said.
 Portugal is the latest target for Chinese investors who have been acquiring buildings around the world as China allows freer movement of funds in and out of the country.
 by acquiring 73 million shares in the company, valued at about C$279 million based on yesterday’s close, according to filings this week with US.
 “As we saw from Siemens acquiring Dresser-Rand, there’s a benefit to offering more products within the oil and gas space,” Justin Bergner, a Rye, New York-based analyst at Gabelli & Co, said in a phone interview.
 Siemens was one of the first large industrial companies to enter the marine energy industry, fully acquiring MCT in February 2012.
 When you look at where that energy is going to come from, a lot of it is going to come from offshore oil and gas development” Waypoint is acquiring a portfolio of 18 AgustaWestland AW139s, 11 Sikorsky S-92s and two Sikorsky S76C++ aircraft from First Reserve Corp, an energy-focused private-equity firm.
 GE is acquiring the latest venture from Richard Santulli, a pioneer in fractional jet ownership who sold his NetJets luxury-leasing unit to Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 While speculation has focused on AB InBev acquiring SABMiller, the second-largest brewer, there are other possible targets, including those outside the beer industry.
 “We used to have a lot of exploration opportunities or blocks, so we are re-balancing that portfolio by acquiring development-to-production assets,” Kgogo said.
 and Lafarge SA after their merger, while also being open to acquiring factories abroad, he said.
 The chairman of the $40 billion Aditya Birla group, which is engaged in businesses from mining and financial services to telecommunications, is open to either acquiring e-retailers or building one from scratch, Birla said in a Nov.
 Yield Search Singapore developers are acquiring mostly offices in London and hotels and commercial properties in Sydney, Colliers said.
 Valeant Acquisition Strategy Valeant has built its business by acquiring companies and cutting research and development spending and other costs.
 Halliburton, an oilfield-services provider, says it can slash $2 billion after acquiring its similar-sized rival.
 Deals are riskiest when they involve a company acquiring another that’s roughly the same size, like Halliburton is doing, according to Pavel Savor, a finance professor at Temple University’s Fox School of Business who has published research on mergers and acquisitions.
 Sunac agreed in May to pay HK$63 billion ($812 million) for a 243 percent stake in Greentown by acquiring shares from Song, his wife Xia Yibo and Greentown Chief Executive Officer Shou Bainian.
 Halliburton will vault into a tie for the second spot with a 16 percent share after acquiring Baker Hughes.
 that’s acquiring Shanghai Oriental Pearl, jumped 99 percent at the close.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Ophir Energy Plc confirmed its interest in acquiring Salamander Energy Plc, which said last week it was in talks with two possible buyers.
 has been acquiring in the US.
 ‘No Prejudice’ Telecom Italia Chief Executive Officer Marco Patuano alsoinformed the board of a proposal sent to F2i SGR SpA,formalizing the company’s interest in starting discussions aboutacquiring a controlling stake in fiber-optic carrier MetrowebSpA as soon as possible.
 Delta had favored models from Chicago-based Boeing over Airbus until acquiring Northwest Airlines in 2008.
 Cowdery is backing the sale to Aviva, which will allow him to complete his original strategy of acquiring and merging ailing life insurers and cutting costs before finding a buyer.
 Kotak Mahindra is in the final stages of acquiring ING Vysya, which is 427 percent owned by ING Groep NV, broadcaster ET Now reported yesterday, citing people it didn’t identify.
 “You don’t have people just rocking by your site, you have to pull them to your site, which means you have to spend on paid search or display ads or other things” The cost of acquiring new customers online fell by more than half to $1044 last year after rising to a nine-year high of $2440 in 2012, according to Cheshire, Connecticut-based Hochman Consultants LLC.
 In June, Google announced it was acquiring satellite company Skybox Imaging Inc.
 Vodafone is also considering acquiring a stake in Metroweb SpA, another Italian fiber company, people familiar with the matter said this month.
 Etihad is also acquiring a stake in Alitalia.
 The deal will also help Siemens fund the 68 billion euros it spent this year acquiring Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 It also brings deep pockets, spending about 26 billion pounds ($415 billion) a year making original TV programs, acquiring rights to Hollywood films and airing exclusive sports events including English Premier League soccer matches.
 JPX is now looking for cooperation with other exchanges in offering joint products and infrastructure businesses, such as risk management or financial investor relations, rather than acquiring other bourses, Yamaji said.
 Al Tayer Group, which opened the region’s first Bloomingdale’s in the Dubai Mall, is taking an equity stake in the Abu Dhabi project as it “will be participating in acquiring the department store space,” Chief Executive Officer Khalid Al Tayer said in an interview today.
 Takeover Offers Towergate also said today it received “approaches from parties interested in potentially acquiring the group,” according to the statement.
 Given that they aren’t phone carriers, there shouldn’t be any regulatory obstacles for Altice acquiring Oi’s assets, Macquarie’s Peddy said.
 French media company Vivendi SA is interested in acquiring Telefonica SA’s 11 percent holding in Mediaset Premium, people familiar with the matter said in September.
 is considering closing an iron ore mine in Canada after deciding an expansion plan isn’t viable, three years after acquiring the project in a $43 billion takeover.
 developer of geothermal power, is acquiring its Tel Aviv-based parent company in an all-stock merger.
 “Potential sellers have decided it’s a good time to sell because they’re realizing the substantial costs that go into being regulatory complaint” Feeding on castoffs has allowed smaller lenders to sidestep pitfalls of acquiring whole firms including regulatory holdups and crisis-era liabilities.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- LabCorp shareholders are skeptical that the company is making the right move by acquiring Covance Inc.
 “The man has an extensive record of engaging in questionable business practices over the years” Alpha’s Settlement Bristol, Virginia-based Alpha, which created the world’s third-largest coal producer by acquiring Massey, agreed in 2013 to pay more than $209 million to resolve a federal criminal investigation into the explosion.
 “I’m more interested in acquiring existing assets than I am in continuing to build” CF, which last month ended talks toward a proposed merger of equals with Norwegian fertilizer producer Yara International ASA, expects to generate more than enough cash to be able to acquire assets, return cash to shareholders or help build momentum for another attempt to reach agreement with Yara.
 Barington suggested four independent director nominees including the activist fund’s founder, James Mitarotonda, and requested talks after acquiring a “significant” stake in Ebix, according to a letter dated today.
 is considering acquiring stakes in diamond mines to secure long-term supply of the gems as it targets growing demand for diamond jewelry in China.
 Next Deals Renovate America, which works with more than 200 cities and counties in California, plans to “take the lead” more on the next deals, holding liens until acquiring a large enough amount to package them into bonds itself, McNeill said.
 “There might be a compulsory tender offer only if the capital-markets board changes the tender requirement from acquiring more than 50 percent of an entity to getting more than half of board control” In Nov.
 MVV expanded its clean-generation business by acquiring Windwaerts Energie GmbH in October and announcing the purchase of a majority stake in Juwi AG, one of Germany’s biggest developers of wind and solar plants.
 regional banks have increasingly bought pieces of rivals instead of acquiring whole firms to avoid the increased regulatory scrutiny of too-big-to-fail lenders.
 “As executive chairman, he’ll be involved in absolutely every critical decision that we make -- acquiring companies, investing in new expansion projects” Kinder Morgan became the fourth-largest US.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Chow Tai Fook Jewellery Group Ltd, the world’s largest listed jeweler, is considering acquiring stakes in diamond mines to secure long-term supply of the gems as demand in China for the precious stone grows.
(Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA has formalized its interest in acquiring Portuguese lender Novo Banco SA, the bank that emerged from the breakup of Banco Espirito Santo SA.
 The appointment of the Greek president, a largely ceremonial post, requires a parliamentary supermajority of 180 that Dimas fell 12 votes short of acquiring on Monday.
 is in the process of acquiring DirecTV for $485 billion.
 After acquiring Canada’sNexen Inc.
 Covance’s directors shouldn’t have hired Goldman Sachs as its financial adviser for LabCorp’s more than $105-a-share offer because the investment firm already represented another company Covance was considering acquiring, the investor said in a Delaware Chancery Court lawsuit.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA, Spain’s largest bank, is considering acquiring the publicly traded shares of its US.
 Thomas Lau, Lifestyle’s chief executive officer, and his family hold 50 percent of the Hong Kong-based retailer after acquiring a 29 percent stake, triggering a mandatory offer for the owner of Sogo department stores, according to a statement to the stock exchange.
 ECMC is acquiring Corinthian’s campuses in hopes of helping students complete their studies and start careers, he said.
 Industrial Spaces GIC, which has been acquiring real estate worldwide, has branched out from prime office towers in major cities.
 The land ministry plans to set up guidelines for acquiring and operating hospitals as more than 30 percent of such facilities no longer comply with the latest quake-resistant rules, it said on its website.
 Chief Executive Officer Joe Kaeser has spent 68 billion euros acquiring Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy business and Dresser-Rand as he focuses Europe’s biggest engineering company on solutions for energy generation and distribution.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Carillion Plc is focused on expanding its own business in an improving construction market after several attempts to form Britain’s biggest builder by acquiring Balfour Beatty Plc were rejected.
 “This means that we can no longer support card-issuing and merchant/ATM acquiring services in Crimea” Visa and MasterCard are caught in the middle of an international dispute sparked by Russian President Vladimir Putin’s move to annex Crimea from Ukraine.
 Yield Search Singapore developers are acquiring mostly offices in London and hotels and commercial properties in Sydney, Colliers said.
 is looking at acquiring a stake in Sainsbury worth “tens of millions of pounds” after being approached this year by a US.
 It brings deep pockets, spending about 26 billion pounds a year making original TV programs, acquiring rights to Hollywood films and airing exclusive sports events like the English Premier League soccer matches.
 Though Ocwen, the largest nonbank servicer, has a smaller slice of the market than those banks, it’s been the most aggressive in acquiring rights to existing home loans.
 Diniz’s Peninsula is acquiring a 10 percent holding in the Brazilian unit for 18 billion reais ($663 million), valuing it at 204 billion reais, including debt and provisions, Carrefour said today.
 Kravis, 70, said acquiring investment firms to expand KKR’s capabilities is a better use of the firm’s balance sheet money than repurchasing shares.
 NextEra has said it may consider acquiring stakes in gas fields to meet half of the utility’s need for the fuel.
 “You don’t have people just rocking by your site, you have to pull them to your site, which means you have to spend on paid search or display ads or other things” The cost of acquiring new customers online fell by more than half to $1044 last year after rising to a nine-year high of $2440 in 2012, according to Cheshire, Connecticut-based Hochman Consultants LLC.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Burger King Worldwide Inc, the fast-food chain that’s acquiring Canada’s Tim Hortons Inc, established a joint venture to increase its presence in Italy, Poland, Greece and Romania as part of its global expansion.
 “Cargill considered all relevant facts, including the attractiveness of acquiring Nutreco relative to alternative potential investments,” the Minneapolis-based company said yesterday.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Hedge fund Maglan Capital said it’s starting a campaign to shake up Madalena Energy Inc’s board and strategy after acquiring a stake of almost 10 percent in the Canadian oil and gas producer.
 In Italy, Telecom Italia has expressed interest in acquiring a controlling stake in closely held broadband carrier Metroweb SpA.
 Barington had suggested four independent director nominees including Mitarotonda, and requested talks after acquiring a “significant” stake in Ebix, according to a Nov.
 Encouraged by Roekke, whose investment company Aker ASA owns 50 percent of Det Norske, the Trondheim-based firm earlier this year spent $21 billion in cash to become Norway’s second-biggest domestically listed oil producer by acquiring Marathon Oil Corp’s Norwegian assets.
 To keep mobile-ad growth on track, the Menlo Park, California-based social network has invested in new tools to enable advertisers to measure how often individuals see their promotions across mobile devices and desktop computers and by acquiring LiveRail Inc, which helps it serve video ads across wireless devices and computers.
 Bain Capital, which has about $80 billion in assets under management, has also been looking at acquiring some of the cement assets from Lafarge and Holcim, people familiar with the matter said in October.
 is acquiring it for about $16 billion in stock, creating a company that will supply chips for products including cars and consumer electronics.
 is acquiring Spansion Inc.
 The potential deal between Mercuria and the ex-OW Bunker traders does not include any physical assets although Mercuria might be interested in acquiring assets sold through the bankruptcy process, one of the people said.
 12 that it was acquiring a stake of about 85 percent.
 will fall on the French company and not General Electric Co, which is acquiring the assets involved.
 Kron had previously said GE would assume liabilities of the energy assets it’s acquiring from Alstom, and an Alstom document presented at today’s shareholder meeting also stated that “by taking over Alstom’s Energy businesses, General Electric undertakes to take on all liabilities and risks exclusively or predominantly associated with said businesses” Alstom shares traded down 39 percent at 2665 euros at 3:06 pm.
 Card Unit While other Japanese companies are interested in acquiring the card unit, Citigroup currently has no plan to negotiate with them or start a fresh round of bidding, the people said.
 company is acquiring.
 Voith is acquiring the stake from Grenzebach GmbH & Co.
 Bain Capital, which has about $80 billion in assets under management, has also been looking at acquiring some of the cement assets from Lafarge and Holcim, people familiar with the matter said in October.
 plunged as much as 31 percent, the most ever, after agreeing to a settlement that prevents it from acquiring mortgage-servicing rights until the company makes improvements to satisfy New York regulators.
 In the last five years, Ocwen has emerged as one of the country’s largest mortgage servicing providers, acquiring rights to hundreds of billions of dollars of unpaid balances on residential loans from companies including Litton Loan Servicing LP, Saxon Mortgage Services Inc.
 Another is YieldCo, used in the energy markets and defined as a “public vehicle created for the purpose of holding and acquiring assets with a predictable cash flow stream in order to fund a regular and increasing dividend to public investors” More colorful terms include “bad actors” relating to private placements under the federal securities laws and “bed bug letters,” which refers to Securities and Exchange Commission letters sometimes issued when registration statements have significant deficiencies.
 It is also acquiring high throughput sorting machines, co-founder Sanjeev Saxena said.
